      "identifier" : [
         "8_06911_402"
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "title" : [
         "The Canadian courier. : Vol. XVI. No. 10 (August 8th, 1914)"
      ]
   },
   "version" : "0.4",
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06911_402/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06911_451/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1",
   "version" : "0.4",
   "doc" : {
      "type" : "document",
      "title" : [
         "The Canadian courier. : Vol. XVIII. No. 7 (July 17th, 1915)"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Biweekly Feb. 2, 1918-Oct. 15, 1920"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Toronto : Courier Press, Limited, [1915]"
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "X XVIIL1 No. 7 H E c July 17th, 1915 AéýN AD,1 Price 10 Cents BRITANNIA AND THE BRAVE An English girl dressed as Britannia, conductiflg wounded British soidiers about the Country Fair in the Londoni Botanical Gardens. -Sport and General.m",
         "THE COURIER. Your Vacation at Muskoka Lakes MUSKÙKAaTM/o Corne to this region of con- genial summer hotels and cottages, excellent camping spots, s pl1en d id fishing, picturesque canoeý routes- winding, streams and miny delightful islands. Makçe - your sumnmer hom' in this ideal resort district. eauti- fui small islands and choice locations for sale. TAKE T HBE CÂNAPIAN NORTIIERN RY. to .~ln est recreation districta.IItàn- ada, includingý: Lake St. John District, Muskoka -La ke s, Rideau Lakes, Lake Edward, Que., Georgian Bay and Parry Sound as well as mnany. offers. WRITE TO-DAY FOR THESE BOOKS-Where-to Fish and Hunt\", MHotel Lake St. Joseph, Quebec\", t«Mus- koka's Lake Shore Line\", \"Summer Resorts Along the Road by the Sea\", «Outdoors in Canada\".ý Enjoy a real recreation, and rest for tired nerves in the pice. turesque lakes, streamüs and wooded isies of Muskoka Lakes District. For fuxther particulars as to, rates and service apply to nearest C.N.R. Agent, or General Passenger I)epartrnent, 68 King Street East, Toronto, Ont. ~~[1~~ - Women ad Temperance T 11EPROBLM ofa'suitable drink for the household issolved forever when you use FRONTENAC BEER. While mildly exhilara'ting it contains so littie alcohol as -to be absolutely harmless taken in any quantity. Recommended by your family physician-all dealers. \"Blue Label \" While mildly exhilarating, Frontenac Blue Label Beer is a true aid to tempe- rance, because you can drink your fill of it without harmrful effect. It is a fine tonic, builds brawn and muscle and aids your digestion. Ail dealers. FRONTENAC BREWERIES L.IMITED MONTREAL Distributor for Toronto. E. T. Sandell, Imp. Co., 523 Vonge St. Take lgonquin Provincial1 (Ontario) Park A Thoroughly tiniversal Vacation Territory Midst Wild and Delightful Scènery Idéal Canoe Trips-A Paradise for Campers- Splendid Fishing 2,000 Feet Above Sea Level The HIGHLAND INN affords fine hotel accommo- dation. Camps \"Nominigan\" and \"Minnesing\" offer novel and comfortable accommodation. at reasonable rates. Write for illustrated matter giving f ull particulars, rates, etc., to C. E. Horning, Union Station, Toronto, Ont.",
         "TIIE COUJRIERI. FORMED AT BY SHOT AND SHELL 'Phofographs of H. M. S. Kent, Now in Dry dock at Esquimait,___________ ~~5 U I I ~~B. C.; Shou'ing How She Tussled Wiih ille Nurnberg h__________ a i th e F a lk la n d Isla n d s _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ erg gunners evidently Ige against the Kent's s, becaute they belched of burning boats and vaysï giving the cruiser more speed than her ge with ail coal. aval pictures in this war Lve Yet been published 01'e startling in detail ail the photographs on Of Ri. M. 'S. Kent; none 0 TUuch Interest ans. This llght 1903 that cbased the Nuruberg wvards Joined In fter the Dresden Alte of the Palk- inl Dec. 8tli, 1914, 1drydock, for, a dental repairs. settling of the he took ber own steamned thou- miles up the seas fromn the 'ific; battered a 'Oles in ber fun- 10si0U.-wreckages cks, a grîm but ste urvivor o! st sea fight but a Dresent war. OtOgraphs recal On Novemlber ~ermaan Pacific whose leading re the Scbarn- L the Gneiseneau, Monmouth and A few .11pe , and came The Kent braught ta Esquimait several souvenirs tram the Dresden; capstan bar, life-buoy, ammuniton cannisters, anchor btJoys, buckets and barricoe; ail shown here along with the Kent's awn drums and bugles. On the drum is painted a Ilet of the batties in- whlch Kents have figured for more than two centuries.. of the littie metal.twistirng andi fu :-played on the Kent by the sheila of the'gettlng-away Sergeant-Major Hayes, one of the Kent's marines, is now entitled to wear the Consplcuous Gallantry Medal. Me grabbed a charge of cordite fired by a German shel from the Nurnberg, flung it over- board and hosed out the flames. raiding German Pacifie squadron. And it was off tbe Falkland Is- lands that the British squadron first sigbted the German vessels. The ships in the British squadron were Kent, Carnarvon, Corn- wall, Canoplus, Bristol, in- vincible, Inflexible, and Macedonia. Kent and Cornwall were sister ships of the lost Monmouth. Mornlng of TuesdaY, Dec, 8, Kent was guardship at the Point known as Fort William. When the look. out reported enemy ships, she at once welghed anchor and, led by the GlasgOW-survivor froma the Coronel catastrophe--. set off to observe the enemy's movements. O Fail the ships under AdmiraI Sturdee In 0that fght, the Kent bas been most talked about. Second In lime be- hinâ the Glasgow, she was one of the pair that the German officers o! the Scharnhorst ahd the Gneiseneau laugbed at wben they hove Into vlew, and before the enemy knew that they were being followed by the big battis cruisers. The Kent dld ber part in helpIng to rid the Pacific of the German squadron that might any day have takea a notion to bombard aur Pacifie Ports. She did 1V dramati- 'cally. There were ept- sodes in the Kent's pro- gramme startling. enough for any dimne novel. Rer norma~l top speed, laid down in 1903, was 21 knots. Chaslng the Nurnberg in December. 1914. qha -f i sipman arvan, the doue in a",
         "THlE COURIER. great burry the night before. But the lack of coal was no bindrance to, tbe Kent. Stories have gone the rounds of bow everything that was ýburnabie and movable on the ship except the furniture iu the offi- cers' quarters was rammed into the Kent's furnaces; according ta one despatcb-\"Tear up anytbiug that wll iiun and tbrow it lu\" was Capt. Allen's com- mand. And fin response, boats, chicken-coops, and companhon-ways were rippeI up and fiung into the fires. The Kent's business was ta everbaul the Nurn- berg. \"We must sink ber, boys,\" said the Captain. *You're Jally well rigbt-slnk 'er,\" was the answer. So the Captaîn was dubbed \"Siuk'er Allen.\" In the sinklng of .the Nurnberg, tbe Kent was bit thlrty-six times. Her armour was pierced, ber decks pitted and ber funnels rlddled wlth slaell-heles. But sbe lest only elght men. Seme tbanks ta Sergeant-Major Hayes, whose pic- ture appears above, tbat the Kent was not eitber worse damaged or burned to a crisp. According to despatcbes: \"A sbell bad burst and fîred some cardite charges in the casernent. Flames shot down the hoist in the ammunition passage. Lt was then that the brave marine Came ta the rescue. Picking Up the charge, he threw it overboard, and graspiug a fire hase, be quickly subdued the fiames.\" Ail this was more than six montbs aga. Since that time the Kent bas steamed up te Esquimaît, where she arrived same weeks aga. She bas now become legitimate copy far despatch-writers from -New York, descriptive writers lu Victoria, and camera-men, wbo got tbe finest realistlc war pictures yet taken ou this side of the Atlantic. Tbe Kent is net merely a warsbip; she ls an insti- tution. The name Kent gaes bac\u003c la the British navy In an unbroken hune of almost apastaiic succes- sion for 250 years. Old wooden sailing sbips with the naine of Kent have been 1l British battles on WILL BELGIUM BECOM many seas. Lt ls douibtful if any of tbem hi experience of the 1915 Kent that is now at Esq! and came through ta bie a living witness ta tbe The big druin shown in one of the picture paiuted au the siats under the cords the nan many vessels fougbt by sbips with tbe naine of Tbese battles and dates are: Lowestoft, 1661 James Tigbt, 1666; Barfleur and La Hague, Vigo, 1702: Malaga. 1 \u003c704, Superbe, 1710; Cap, saro, 1718; Princessa, 1740; Ushaut, 1747; Ca 1757; Nurnberg, 1914; Dresden, 1915. Tbese are the naines of the sbips with xvbich have faught -for mare than twa centuries. Tbe of 1915, 'built in 1903, is the wartby successar lot. After sinking tbe Nuruberg, she taolc P tbe cbase after the escaping Dresden, wbich afterwards given ber final coup in Cbilean 'ç Hence the traphies from the Dresden sbown spoils collection of the Kent. E BRITISH What is to Become of JJel-aium Has A ireadu Dffiided Officiai Germanu int Tno Camt,.ç W ILL Beliumn become British after the war? Tequestion bad been pesed by tbe editor ef the Canadian* Courier. We hadl just finlsbed dinner at the Albany Club, ln To- ronte, Tte quickly meving figures ail about us sug- gested tbat the neon bout was fading into afternoon and tbat the mon of affaîrs were again lndulging their thougbts la tbe tasks to wbieh tbey were burrylng. A stewardl rusbed across tbe floor la an effort te inter- cept a member wbo was just ready te beave. A smal groiri at a table off ta the right studled a war mail, apparently fer the purpose of justlfylag the morning's despatcbes. We were dlscussing those features of the war whlch bad net aiready been bas4hed and rehasbod, lu the daily press. Keenly alert, tbe editor ieaned forward la bis eagerness te listen. I bad Just recently re- tiirned frein tbe front; lu fact, the duli, lnsldlous groaulng of tbe cannon was still lu my ears. Mine bad been an unusual experieuce. My Canadian papers stî,ll lay burled beneath Belgian sali, and we new revIewed. the many, tbrlilling Incidents assoclated wltb my isojoura of neariy tbree montbs amoagst tbe German armies, always under the kludly pretectien ef American, passporte. Net untl' these moments o! aftet refiection, dld I really see the danger te wblch. 1 bad been exposed. But after ail, It was a ms.tter o! ailowlug the 'past dead bury Its dead. I was safe again on my native soli. A GAIN I couid ses t'be ceuntless logions of the Kaiser tbrown agalnst that wall o! steel aleug the banks of the Yser canai. I saw once mare the rivers, canais and Iuundatod lands runuing ted witb the crimsen. blood o! the Teutons. I could see lu fuller and grander hlgbt the remuant of that littie Belian army, fifty tbousand strong, but big onougb te held back the mercileas and ever persistlng Huns. Net far away, a\u003end off týo the rlgbt, the British were drlvlng. back the attacks o! tbe Germans as they sougbt to crusb the linos o! defence abeut Ypres. To the soutb, thie Fblick, heavy smoke that bung as a pail over the earth, toid tn language evon ctrongei' than words, that the French were stIi pusblag farthor and fartber back, the enemy wbo had sought te enter la and destroy one o! ithe finest republ4cs on eartb. Tbe tragedy of thie war passed bof ore my mental vision, as I pondieted over the question whlcb this. well-knewn oditor had pesed. Will Boîgiuin become British aftor thie war? I knew o! the splendid sym- patby wtlcbh the British bad awakened lu the bearts o! the Belgians long bofore war had boon declared. Hlstery taught me, that for many long years, Eng- land bad been a warm and devoted frlend o! the little kingdom. acrees tbe channel. But what a wonder!uI bond o! !rloudsblp bad boon dovolopod la the more recent months! The neutraity ef Belglum had been crueliy vio- iat-ed by a tee, who sought, througb a pollcy of lire, pillage and massacre, te eliminate thie Beian char- - -., -----------.~ -- By STANLEY N. DANCEY o! ail the warrlors be had. eucounterod. But frein that moment te this, Beliuin bad net kno-wn tb.at peace and tranqulity wblch was its rlgbt and pro- porty. TÉe Roman occupation was followed by the Spanlsb, 'wdo, under the guldÏng spirit o! the Duke d'Albe, subjected tbe Bolgians te ail formas o! cruolty and torture. Tbe Inquisition was only ane o! the trials througb whleh tboy had to pass. But agaîn was BrItain the frieud o! Belgium. Tbe long days o! tbe mule o! Orange Naseau laid the teundatien for Belgin's: first broath o! freedom. In the Theatre Monnaie, at Brussels, thore was bolng enacted a draina entltled *'Le Muote de Portici.\" It was taken frein the spirit o! the Itallan revolutlen. That was lu tbe latter days o! Septembet, 1830. The seod of liberty had long since been planted and s0 It wgs that the revolutlonary drama was accorded a magnificent reception. One of the capltal's met gifted singors came out on tbe stage one night ta si.ug bis own composition. It was the caîl o! liberty that ocboed and re-eoed tbroughout the strains o! that muslc, for It was none otiher than \"'The Braban- cone,\" naw Belglum's national anthom. T -Eenthusiasin wqilch, the singer evoked was tee mucb for a peaceable world. te carry. \"Vive la Revolutilon.\" The audience Jolnod lu tbe spirit et the entbuslaam, and frein that theatro went forth the luspirlng agents whe soon preclpitated tbe re- volution through wblcJi Belglum secured ber freedein. And lu tbe -moment e! her aow-bought il! e of liberty, Boîgluin turned te, the larger and much stronger powers te secure tbat measure o! protection wbicb would men that ber freedoin would be Immune frein hostile effort. Great Britalu and (Gormany were amongst the nations wbo slgned the covenant guar- antoolng the neutraity e! Boliluin. Germuy now regards the agreement as a more scrap o! paper. Great Britaln went te war te justify that s'pirit e! honour in vhkeh she made that guýara'utee te littie Bolginin. Great Britain bas justified ber friondsbip for Bel- glum by a sacrifice 'wbih will easily ean for ber a basting influence la tire lite o! thie Belian people. By ineans o! a pollcy of peacotul penetration, Ger- maýny had eateu ber way Inte tbe very beart of the little klngdem. She largely coutrelled the ï1nanclal woend, Iu t'he industrial ephere sbe was fast bie- comlug thie most potent factor. Seciaily, altbough the Blians detosted tbe Teutons, they veto surely fanding a strong footing, so mnuch so, tibat the spy systein evon embraced the Royal palace at Brussels. ,\u0026arcoiy a public work thete vas, but that a Gem- man ongineer was beld ln a consultiag capacity. Thon, when It came te mattor o! purchasiug supplies, it vas oui\u003e' natural t-hat German materlals should bie the most hlghiy recommended. Large purchasixng agents inevitabiy found theinselves placed under the influence of Gemman trade agents. Germany had ga,lned control of almoat everytbing la Belginin vlth tbe exception o! the seul ef the people. There vas net enougb money lu ail the Fatherland te purchase that preclous force. The resistance o! the Belgiaus at Liege gave the Huns convlneing evidence of that tact. B UT ail this bas been obanged by the var. The tee, whlqh bas conte in and destreyed wltb suclh a wanton band te liappiness and prosperlty of this peace-bovlng and industrious race w\u0026li bie for many decades Rhut out; front the lite o! that nation. Gomma goeds vili and must be boycotted. Gomman money viii ho sor'ned. \u003clermn influence viii ibe driven out of 'the social and industrial lIte of te poople. Thore was a moment when Belgium thought that site couid net live without thte German inven- tiens and tbe German-made articles. But tbo wvar has proved that she must do se, and thie magulficent spirit whbkb burns in the' heart cf ail Belglum to-day suggests titat it viii bo as it shouid. Beigium must came Iuta bier awn. She i more Belgian tban -ever before. Political a] lîgieus strife bas, la the past, opened up those neis tbraugb wbicb these trýaitarous forces crept In, but the war will ,close and seal these neis. Tbe Clericals opposed strenuousiy tbe de ment of Belium's mltary strengtb, and, lu 50 played into tbe bauds o! the treacherous foe. Liberals, ever bent upon progress and true fr goverument, bhave struggled for years te rescl gîuin frein those Influences wbicb were ase' draggiug ber dewn. The war will give new and impetus te tbe Liberal movement, for, af t it is fouuded on the princîpies laid down by Abý Lincoln, whbleb meant a geverument for the r tb'rougb the people aud by the people. Tbar tbe Liberals, Belgium was la a position te 'ho Gerinans back at Liege, and to save the cause Alleas. Walloon in tbe soutb bas ever been oi by Fleming la the nortb, but the war bas mi the Belgians a unIted peeple, witb one comme Pose te serve. Political and religiaus differenc( be burled ln tbe ashes of Prussian militarisii eut of tbese ýasbes will rise a new and more edlfice. QUlTE naturally, the new Beîgiuin wiii tiý berm ost devoted !rlend lu the boum oi t uiler freedoin. *That nation, wblcb shol and proected ber lu the boum e! Pari, will te iu hem bife as a force of inspiration and Influ As large a part as Great Britain bas playod il l! e e! Belgium la the past, it ýonly tollows la Ic sequence, that she wIii play an even more impo raie, once tbe barrots o! this terrible war bave forevor elîinated. In the reconstruction of littie klugdom, Brtisb money and British braini ho a potent facter, -and, lu this, wiii be laid the datien upon vitich it l bo bulbded a pem friendsbip and sympatby betiveen the two po If one studios care!ully the trade figures fo' past ton or tweive years he wilI ses at once itow man morchants and manufacturers bave grad werked temselves into control o! the Bolgian kets. Lt výas a common tact, tibat the inajeri articles ia Boîgiuin, priar to thie war, veto o! Go: manufacture. Ia 1912, Beliuin beught frein niany noarly eigbt huudred million francs wor goods, wblle at the saine tino she sold te Gori ever one billion francs' o! matorials. Great BI was tortuuato en ou gb, ln thîs yoar, te secure a over five bundred million francs o! business, shle shippod. Juta Belýgium geods te the saine But, lu the iast two years, Germauy bas inadE mest important strides la wlnniug Belium a almost exclusive market. The war bas, itow made titis ne bouger possible. German goods nover again fiad a place la the Belgian market. Thore are 7,423,000 inhabitants iu Boliuin; vas before the war. O! theso, three million s Frencht oxcluslvely, tbmee million speak FbW whble oe million speak the two lauguages. It market wondorfully richin laoppertunlty. -Ab4c tom the incroasod devobopinent witich must Inevi tollow la Beigian lndustry, once the instrumen war bave been laid aside, and reconstruction been comnpleted, lthere is stili a large and grc need te satlsfy. Germany's place la the market hoe tabou by another, anid it la onIy loglcab to cen tlmat British-made gooda wiii satisfy a largoe o! tis ueed. Canadian inonufacturers and Canadian people not for~ger the oppertunlty whlcit lies befere the ~Belgluin, Evon, s e have givea o! eur armt ont muen and ourt mouey te Beîglumin a er ho] need, se wili Beiginin give te us, la 'ber days ot 1 and itappiness, a market that will more titan ni ponse us fer any sacrifice that vo may have ri No, Belgiuin vili nat become British a! tom the Shte 'W\u003cl1 beelino mtome BeIgian than over. But Bi Influence wlll flnd a langer and a frleudier si in Beliuin.",
         "TRIE COURIERI. U-MME*R SNAPSHOTS FROM THE WEST 'egro sa raising troops in America. As volunteers are not aIlowed ta return to the colours directly fram a neutrai country, Bomne of themn cross ta Canada first. This îs a photograph of 250 Montenegrins at Sarcee Camp, near Calgary, en route ta the front. wasp may be useful ln a fight. Montenegro is the ~of Europe. She is as busy flest of yellow-jackets figbt- 1, and an that accounit bas an,. which is the capital of .e lîttie posta:ge-stamp, bone 3fl Just soutb of Montenegro, Adrlatlc. According te late last week, the papula- rdered ta surrender ail arms Gitlon ta th. 'Montenegrins. itions af -ws r, such as they banded autto a new littie which Mo6ntenegro seems 1g, part of it tram America. LYs ago the plains near Cal- h 'have always been the ids of' picturesque people, Men, were oddly decorated rival of 250 Mautenegrins Manitana, accampanled by ilcers in native unit orm, seema ta have kept iu.case rgency wbere a wasp army .ieeded. As. may bie nated 1g group phaotograph above, se Montenegrins are miners as lie! work -witb rifles In wltb picks in a mine., And certalnly the strangest er ýcamiped lIn this country ýd inen went on the warpath. qGTON is now bavîng a few Plctosover the Mante- 'in question. Agents of ýnegrin Government have In. the United. States drum- reservists and recruits. 'ug~h not officia] af the Brit- liment, are said ta have the saine thlng. The Fed- 7iteS have interfered with Sof these volunteers across a0il for the purpose of goiiIg 't; aithougli it Is, not con- 7each of neutrality ta permit ta returzl ta the calours of ta which they belong. Sir Montenegrin officers from Butte, Mont., In native unlform at Sarcee Camp. The finest photograph ever taken of Saskatchiewanl Parliamiet Buildings, where drastic llquor legisiation is niow the order o(*the day. Cecil Spring-Rice, British Ambassador at Washington, bas asked for a rullng on tbe question. The Federal officiais make a distinction between reservists and recruits. As tbe Montenegrins sbawn in the photograpb above were nat permitted ta pass tbrougb United States territory for the purpose of going back to the army, it must be assumed that tbey are nat reservlsts, but volunteers. A LL aver tbe West war continues to be as mucb a problema of prac- tical business as getting ready for the biggest crop In western bi8tary. Sewell Camp, Man., is tbe biggest camp on the prairies. One of the moat ln- terestlng episodes in connection witb tbat camp is that presented In the pbotograph below, wben Lleut.-Gover- non Brown presented two members of bis Legislature witb wrist watcbes and liuge llluminated addresses. These two M.P.P.'s, from South Qu'Appelle and Lloydminster, understand that lu enlisting for active service abroad. tbey are turning their backs au a lot. o! spectacular flgbtlng at home. Sas- katchewan, whose 'beautiful LegIsla- tive pile le shown on this page, bas twe great problems on ber band this year-wheat and whisky. The wheat she expects ta be the blggest bumper crop ever pulled off In the province of wheat. The whisky Is ta be regulated. And this whisky problem, wbicb, since the days of the 'bad Indlan and the smuggling gangs In the North-west, Territories bas been a succession af comic operas witb a serions purpose, is now regarded as not menely a pro- vincial or even a merely national ques- tion. Wbat Saskatchewan does wlth the liquor question is ta be considered lu connection wltb wbat bas been doue witb it in Russia, lu France aud ln Englaud during the war. Meanwhile, the West is absorbed in the three great problems, war, whisky and wbeat. wa Lieut...Governor Brown and Col. Eliott, Commander for of Sewell Camp, wlth Premier Scott in the rear. The Governor takea the salut. as a battallon marches past.",
         "THE COURIER. CHURCH UNION IS NC Pro gress of the Movement A mong Met hodists, Presbyterians T RUSTS are recognized as bad institutions for the welfare of mankind. Truste have been fought by the press and by.,the people. Trusts are sald to have ralsed the cost of living and taken away mucli of the joy and freedom of life. Under trust ride Individual action le reduced to a minimum, art ia dîicounted, freedom of expression la hampered,.social discontent arlses--and presenVtly there arises fsome other combination to combat th4e trust. The second may be as bad as the tiret, or worse. Socialism may be the worst torm of trust in the worid. Labour unions mnay be se misdirected that they become a syndicate robbing the worker of his individuality out of regard-to the rights of the corporation. The- atricai truste âre responsibie for a great majority of the bad pla9s In our theatres. National trusts coerce the people Into a machine for the execution of a single idea-and the Prussien national trust is the worst ever known ln Uic World, against which the'-worid of freedomn la now fighting as it never tought before. la Church Union another form of trust-in the spiritual worid? Wiil the union of Christian churches into as far as possible one church rob 'mankind of religious individuality and freedom? Or la the union of churches only a sensible, fraternat, proposition whose principie is the greatest good to the greatest number and the elimination of use lesa 'rivairies? In the followirrg article the writer traces the his. tory of th~e Church Union movement ln this country and notes what he considers its advantages ln prao- ticai operation. He does net regard Church Union as a form of religiaus syndicate. He believes In it as a means cf making church litc more useful te the masses. Hie arguments and his narrative are Well. Worth considering by any average man or woman Who recopnizes the church as a great force for the betterment of social conditions. W1HEN the General Assembly of the Presby- terian Church la Canada recently adopted, by an overwhelming majority, the report VV of the committes on Church Union, an- etiher stage la the movement for the confederation of the Preabyterlan, Methodist and Congregational denominationa la thia country vas reacbe.d. Tbe concurring vote vas 367 to 74, and not only gave the advocatea of union the largeat majerity aince the Aasemnbly live years ago passed upon the aub- ject, but shows that on a percentago basis the oppon- enta cf the innovation lare gradually decreaslng la relative strength as far as It la represented la the hlghest court of the churoh. la 1910, vhen the hasia of union vas firat under conaideration, the recorded vote of the opponenta of union was 28 per cent of the total case; la 1914 It vas 27 per cent., and at the recent meeting cf the General Assembly, 16 per cent As the Methodist and Congregational denomina- tiens are both ready for union, its conaummation only awaita the final declalon of the Preabyterlan Church. T RIS final decion cannot be given for a year or two at the least. In the firat place, the ques- tion has te bo submlitted te the individual con- gregationa composlag the church in Canada. 0f týheso there are over 2,325, net lncludlng home mis- sions to the nunlber of about 2,000, whlle cf mem- bers entltled to vote upon the question there are about 315,000. After the questions whlch are nov bsing prepared have been submltted to and voted upon by the people, the. subject of union viii again come bof ors the General Asaembly, which dos not meet until June, 1916. If the vote of the people ia favourable te union by a substantial majorlty, thers can be lîttie or no doubt in regard to th~e action of the higheat court la the church. But even after the peeple and the. Genrl AssembIy have concurred la favor of Chureh Union, its consummation cannot be acconi- pllshed until Federal and Provincial legislatien bas been obtalned. The Hous of Commona will have te pass upon Incorporation, and in each of the Pro- vincial Legoslatures an Act wili bo necessary por- mittlug the transfer to the unlted church of the Droflerty nov held ln the naine of each of the three By W. L. EDMONDS that a few montha ago the J'oint commlttee of the three denominationa concerned reached -an -agree- ment regardlng the name, doctrine and pollty of the proposed Union Church. The namne agreed upon vas the United Church of Canada. 'The doctrine, vhlle largely based on that obtainlng la the three negotiatlng churcheÉ, dos nlot differ la essentials from that of either. If any- thing, it shows a desire to inpart to doctrine a littie more elasticlty and a broader spirit. Ia regard to polity, it vas agreed that the highest court of the United Church should bo knovn as the General Coundil. ,Next in order are the Conference and Presbytery. The flrat-n9aznsd court will meet every second year and vlll be Dominion-vide la its repre- sentation. The Conference yull meet annually, and the Presbytery vlll correspond la its functions tu the court of that namne nov oporating vithin the Presbyterian Church. Local churches are te have a session 'to superlatend their spiritual affaira, a committes of stewards to manage their business affaira, and these tvo combined are to formi the officiai board, viiose office vilI be te oversee the general affaira of Its ovn particulâr, congregation. This basis of union has been formally accepted by the three denominationa concerned. But ons of the moat sîgnificant featureslan regard te the basis of union for the proposed United Church la lta democratic character. Each IndivIdual congregation vilI practically be able te employ vhat- ever form cf worship its people may deern beat auited te ita requiremnts. Each of the three de- nominations, for example, may continue te use its ova hymn-beook. Ia tact, the limbrella that is being ralsed is expansive enough to take la Anglican and Baptist denominations should they at any time be dlsposed to participate la the union. Nine years ago the Anglican Church offerod te confer upon the subject of union, provided the joint committee of the three negotiatlng churches vas villiig to treat along the linos laid dova by the Lambeth Conference. As this implled the accept- ance of Episcopacy, negotiations vlth the Anglican Church vers discontlnued. The Baptiat Church. con- sldering it \"neceasary to maîntain a separate organ- ized existence,\" refused te partîcipate la the move- ment for union. C-ONUMMATION ôf the present movement for %.,te union cf the Preabytenian, Methodiat and Congregational Churches, la its final analysis, merely means the uaion et the hlgher courts of each. And that ineans a great doal, for ilits train vilI come greater efficieacy, greater economy, and an absence of the overlapping whlch 1s nov se common la the vork of the three denominations. The total membership of the thres denominations whiclh are 2iegotlating for union vas, la 1914, 697,444, of vhich 368,992 vers Methodists, 314,832 Presby- terians, ani 13,616 Congrogatlonallsts. Counting adherents, the numnber of people interested la much. largor. For example, according te the last censtus, thons are la Canada 1,115,324 Presbyterians, 1,079,899 Methodist,, and 34,054 Congregationalists, a total of 2,229,270, or 30.93 per cent. et the total religlous population ef Canada. By vay ef comparîson, it may be pointed eut that the Roman Cathollc popula- tien la 2,833,041, or 39.41 per cent. of the total. As thons are 203 secta or denominatlena la Canada, the number would stili stand at over 200 should the Methodists, Presbyterians and Congregationallats ainlc their ldeatlty, as fan as naine la concerned, la the proposed United Church. UST when the spirit of union among the non- cenformiat churches ot Canada had Ita birth ne oas can aay. But It la sîgnificant that the fIrst nonconformist church built la Canada vas, for a union congregation. This vas ln 1751, and vas erected at Halifax by the Imperial authorities. Its congregation composed Congregationaliats, Presby- tenians, Germian Lutherans, Wesleyaas and others, vhlle the preacher was an Ainerican Congregation. \u003eT A TRUSI and Con gregationalisis paassvenoe eand mmeet1ames epm~modc aetivItY. That the movement. which is apparently stroWl to-day than it ever vas, is nlot born of any des for denominational aggrandizement la self-evide from the tact that Preabyterians, Methodists 11 Congregationaliats, each'of whoni la proud Of naine, tradition and hlstory, are willlng to si their Identity in order to unite, nlot for the proP\u0026 tien of any creed,-but for the specile and deftl' purpose of securlng greater efficlency in social a vice and In home and forelgn mission work. TH OSE who are opposed to organic union ar sympathy with the object sought, but t contention la that it can be obtained by operation. But so far the only organlzed effor negative the movement for organic union la -'Wl the ranks of the Presbyterian Church. And altho they are apparently a amali mlnorlty,' y et -theY aggresaive, and boast that they are prepared spend large suma of money in order to preserve Presbyterian Church and defeat the purpose of advocates of organic union. One prominent 8 wealthy iember is credited wlth sayi 'ng that he personally prepared to put up hiait a million dollO But if the people want union money will not 1) vent lts conamation. And apparently the peoý do want It. The spirit of union is abroad throui out the length and breadth of the land. In the WE ern Provinces, where the need of union la M( strongly felt,,there are between forty and fifty un] churches. Some of these were started ag uni churches. Others are amalgamations of two more congregations. These churches were atari with the vlew of ldentifying theniselves with 1 United Church whlch the Presbyterians, Methodi and Congregationaliats have, during the last f0 teen years, been trying to forni. If the pres, movement for Church Union fails, lt ias ad th' union ehurches in the West will go over to the gregational denomination. P ROBABLY the moat unique and lnteresting 1 tempt at Church Union that la being worl out by an Individual congregation in Canada that beink operated by, the Northern Congregato~ Church la Toronto, the pastor of which lasIR Frank Day, M.A., B.D. ýThis church, which had origin'In 1858, found ît necessary a few years to look about for a new site, whlch vas ultlxnat found la the new resldential district of North Uc dale. As there vas no church in the district, -11 contained .about 400 familles, the pastor conceil the idea that it would be well, before building oP( tiens vers commenced, to try and have it mad4 union church. The first step was to consuit joint committes, which the Methodiat, Preabyrter and Congregational Churches in Toronto appoirt a couple of years ago, to regulate the establIsha of churches, and missions vithin the clty, la or' that overlapplng and crowdlng mnlght bo avoid This commi' ttes, falling Into lino with the vlews Mr. Day and is congregation, decreed that its c sent would be withheld should an attempt be 111i by any body of Presbyterlans, Methodists or gregationaliste te establish a church vithin confines of North Rosedale. The cburch vas tl erected at the corner ef Roxborou'gh Street Gien Road, and in Decelaber last, vas forTi opened, SInce thon, of elghty-five new memb received, only ton were Congregationallats. 'J rest were froni other denominations, includlng An' cans and Baptiata. The practical experiments which are belng vor] out by individual congregations ln Canada appeat augur welI for the larger scheme of church un should the efforts of the Presbyterlan, Methodist ý Congregationai Churches give birth to the Uni Church of Canada. Organize the Brains LLOYD GEORGE made a great tas pr the resuit more",
         "THE CURIEER. M AIN L y PERSO0NA L -ai1way Experts in War KING a nation into an army in tits country la not the ready-to-wear business that It la il' Germany. But bere and there aiready a great nunMber of mnen who were formerlY and Industrial and railway experts are taking hbid 0 f the army business. Not to \u003c ~mention Sir Thomas Sbaughnessy, who should be wearing a uniform now that the C. P. R. bas become the main purchasing agent S of the Britishl War Office, tilere are a couple of C. P. R. ex- perts whose portraits appear on tits page and who bave ieft the C. P. R. to go Up against that other greatest SYS- tom in the world, the Prussian war machine. k Lt.-Col. Fred Gas- coigne got leave of ail\u003e sence from, the C. P. R. to-go to the front as an officer In the 6Oth Bat- talion. As Superinten- dent of Car Service Of the Eastern Lines, be knows as mucil about roiling stock as any German war lord; but hie preferred to use bis abilities developed ln peace for the, purpose of helplng to get peace in tbe world as soon as 'aaacolgiie, a C.P.R. possible. Just at pre- ýn9aged In drum- sent Col. Gascogne la recruit8 for the busy drunm.ing up re- war. cruits for bis battallon, ia wblch a son of Sir 2hiaughnessy la a lieutenant. '119 ago another C. P 'R. officiai. landed In wearing thle uniform of a Lt.-Col. He was ,,ad O! the 42nd Highllanders: Lt.-Col. George Canitite, wbo bas heen a non-pro)fessional Or a long whîîe. In fact, at the Chlamplain lary, in 1908, Lt.-Col. Cantîle was awarded ser'vice decoration-ait-hougil be was boni ýa Of Conftederation and ls stili a compara- \u003elang mnan. He bas been with thle C. P. R. SYear the last apike was -driven-1885. Bora ,eal, bie bas lived tilere ail lis life. Wben ,ack to tbe C. P. R., Lt.-Cýol. Cantlie wiil bave idea of what a great system means to a anId wbat a man amounts to I a system. Britishl army. Premier Asquithl alludes publicly to Lord Haldane as bis oid political frlend of tblrty- five years. Tilere Is said to be a movement to get him bacli Into thle Cabinet-wliere bis brains, if properly applled to a patrIotlc emergency, qulte entitie hlm to be. But of ahl pubie men, Lord Hal- dane ls least entltled to accuse thle Britishl people of too much Job and Jeremlab; and of ail recent makers of jeremiads, judged jby tbe fInanciai part o? bis speechl to the National Liberal Club, be is one of the gloomiest. The Soldier Speaks BRIG.-GENERAL BERTRAM may have made a, nuniber of speeches in lis day-atbougb lie Is by profession a manufacturer and a soldier. But le wiil neyer say anything la public that wIl be rememfbered, longer on bis accouai than thle thlngs lie sald about war munitions ini Canada to the Cana- dian Manufacturera' Association a few weeks ago. That speechl caused the Toronto Star to pull In uts borna. For some days îhe Star lad been lambasting thle Goverament because tbere was no Miister of Munitions in Canada and because Canada was net getting ber share of war ordera. Wben Gen. Bertram, cbairman o! the Shll Committee at Ottawa, told thle C. M., A. that 247 lactorles ta Canada were en- gaged in turnlng out war orders, tbe Star admltted that thle Sheil Committee with Gen. Bertram as its representative Ia public was not so bad after ail. And Ia iess tban two weeks everytblng was more or iess \"as you were.\" Canadian manufacturers were toid that they must quit maklng empty sabelis sucil Lt.-CoI. George Stephen Cantlie, another C. P. R. expert now at the front. -as tbey lad been doing on order, and go Into maklag 8 \"fixed\" ammunîtion. There was a united proteat 1- 'whloae ecboes are atili boomng about Parliament i 11111. Tlie crittcs wanted to know if Gea. Bertran' 0 k-new anyfrblng about tis change o! programme whea 1 lie made lia Optlmlstic speech aJbout -war munitions. 1 lIf so, wliy did lie not apeak out Instead of trytng to make e-verybody feei good? If lie did not knaw-wliy ç dldn't lie? I_ And île questions are attîl Ibelng asked. Thle f probabîlities are tilat Gen. Bertran' did not k.now- B or the Sheli Committee-or aven île Canadian Gov- V erament-that wlen Lloyd George became Mîniater o! Munitions le would set on foot a different pro- e gramme tram île oid, baplazard systeln of munition- s malclng. At thle sanie time tle speechl O? Gea. Bertrani 1 was very welcoene. It matsed Canadian hopes so àl 11gb-to have thon' dasb\u0026l down again. But it e beaves no refiection on île abthity or tbe -persplcaclîy e o! Gea. Bertran', who la a fine manufacturer and an ;- able soîdier and does iiot ofiêi speak 'witliout know- t ing wlat lie taika about. a That Academic Deficit S IR EDMUNU WALKER Is once more dlgnifiediy es dîsconsolate la QuGOli's Park, wltb île annual t deficit of île University o! Toronto\u003e, of wblcb i lie is chairman o! île Boar\"d of Governars. Sir Ed- muad as a financier and a Manl o! academic culture e la botter able ta understand tbis annual hard-upness a of a great univarsity tlan an2Y other man in Canada. The chan~ces are that 'with ail lits falîi I gavera- rmental aid, Sir Edinid would be quite willllng ta h ave a Toronlto pocket-editioU o! Sir William Mac- donald to put tis annuai academlic deficit Into a nice, decent littie grave. Immortalizing Frohman I-I E proposai to perpetuate thle name of Charles R roilman by establlshiag a company known ~as te Chlarles Froilman Inc. is a fine Idea. Years ago Mr. Frohinan told David Beiasco, lis friend and sometimes rival, that lie would some day bave a theatre of bis own. He got ItL The proposai made now 'by Daniel Frohman, Maude Adams and another ls to incorporate a company to run tis theatre and the agency 'wblch Mr. Froilman bad establisled for the engagement of theatrical stars. No douhi David Belasco wouid have been 'wlllng togo on tlie board if lie bad flot been la the samne business blmaelf. Charles Frolman is more entitied to have bis namne perpetuated Ia thle world of drama tban Carnegie bas to placard bis on a big music bail In New York and the Carnegie Institute Ia Plttsburg. Froliman. was a theatrical creator. Carnegie ls a dieburser. Whlcb is a distinction too often overlooked. Paderewski's Patriotism PADEREWSKI Is sald to bave lest practically ah bhis property througil the war. He la inow in America, as lie lias been la Engiand, organ- izing relief for tbe Polisil nation, of wbom lie tele- graplis: \"Needs enormous, beip urgent, mtaery ta- describable, 200 citles, 7,500 towns and villages, 1,40\u0026 cilurclies are destroyed.\" Statistics la not a strong. point wltli Paderewski. Poland must beas vast and populous country to bave 200 clties-uniess thle cities are smail; or 7,500 towns--unless the towns are villages. At the same ttme, Poland bas been tomn apart, steam-roilered and ground to duat under the wetght of contending armies almost, If not quite, as mudli as Beiglum. Paderewski Is to play la America, next seas on. He will make money. Sufferlng Poland wli get it. Paderewskl's patriotlsm ls as great and as fine as bis music. A Cosmopolitan Committee PROMINENT Canadlans bave also taken up witb tlie Poîlsil reitef organization. Tilere la a PPoIlsil Relief Commlttee o! Canada; and ha~ main centre o! activlty ls naturaily Winnipeg. Thle cliairman 0f tile Generai Committea ls Sir Douglas Cameron, Lt.-Governor of Manitoba; cilairman or executive commlttee, Mayor Waugh, of Winnipeg- The generai committee contains Premier Norris, Arclisbop Matileson, Btshop Bellveau, Rev. Salem Biand, Lady Al Ikns, Mrs. Colin Campbell, Mrs. H. P. Gailoway, Mr. T. R. Deacon and Sir Rodrnond Roblil. Tis la as efficient and'as imposlng a liat of citizens. as couid be found la any part of Canada. XI containe many people known for their good works, brain. power and benevoience. lIs organization la a credit to Manitoba and to Winnipeg. Its work wili go on record as oae of the ibest examples of cosmopoltait patriotlsm ever known la Canada. This country la no longer a preserve for the Rose, Slamrock and Thlstie. The Pol- lI Roe!e Com- mlttee ta a con'- p a c t llustration o! tle faot tbat w«e bave become a world country, one of the great- est la area, smal- lest In population and moat poten- Uial ta sympatby. AT last Kip- A ling lihasa broken bis long silence. The poet and prose- wrlter o! Britishl soldlering made a recrulting speechi la West Lanca- Hle put more biard- a-a-ials, out- spoken phhloa-opby into that speech tilan any of the great omators have donc la the sane number o! words. W hl a t Germaniy wouJd do ta Eng- land If aile weme allowed to con- quer lie aiowe wit a few strokea as con- Brig.-General Bortram, Chairman densed as any o! of the Siheil Commlttee at Ot- his fanious verse. tawa. 7",
         "TO SLAY TIRE COURIER. AND TO SPA-RE The Bank Cou ldn'i Carry Botb the Man from Brunton and the Man from Shapworih O Nadistant continent, six tousand miles away across tbe seas, two giant-cubs ot nations were battllng for mastemy. The Great Powers held sevemely aloof. The lesson 0f the Balkan blaze had been branded Into thein. Eaoh would have liked te grab at the spoils cf victory, but dared inot. They trumpeted their neutrality, proclaimlng,- \"See how nobly im- partial are We.' Yet, such îs the interwoven web o! 11f e on this planet, the misery a! war eddied out ta the continent o! Europe, breaking tbe Ilves o! men and women who had no a-ay and no sentiment I the stmuggle. The everberatian was named a Trade Crisis, -and its taleo e! laughter in a score o! districts living by manufacture and expomtlng their products ta the two young nations was recorded In the news columus of the papers sIde by side with the lurid sensations o! war. This stary telisof oue smal eddy. IN the e.ntrails of England's inanufacturing. area are two towns four miles apart centre ta centre, joined like Siamnese twins by connective tissue of textile milîs, each wlth its feudal group o! squat, harsb, grey-stoiie operatIves' cottages and petty shope, misesion halls and cinema shows. Only a borough officiai could epecify where Brunton ends and Shapworth begins. Their 11f e-blood fiows lu common. They manufacture the samne class of tex- tile goode, and they.are dependent on the sanie world-factors (W commerce. The 'war in South Arn- erica was forcing the mIlls o! bath towns ta eut down running-time, disiis eperatives, pare profits ta the quick, and clencli tiglit on aIl runuing channels o! trade. Rumours o! pendinýg feilures hung like the nilasma of grey sioke over the hideous spawu o! factory cettage-barmacks and blowsy shape. Brunton and Shapworth glary In a meaninigles rival-ry, They exuit over addlng a thousaud mere stunted seuls ta their respective tale :of population; over football tmlumphs; over the tax-rate; over dilmate even, claiming for eacb that the polluted air Is sweetem, the grlmed sunehine more abundant. To the native, theme le somethlng cf majesty in the mere name of Brunton or of Shapworth. Sir James Langley, chair-man e! the Brunton and Shapwomth Bank, bhad been sumnioned f rom London te decide a questien that mattered vitally ta the twiu towns. .Two of the largest mille were deep in the finauciai quagimie; the bank had called la Ite lbans; they could nat meet the obligations; eue ill muet be closed out, or bath, and it was is duty by the shareboldere of the ýbank ýta slay or ta spare, accord- lng ta the cold dictates of commercial expediency, and regardlese e! the mnisery it ýwould entail on the thousande o! operatives, clerks and petty traders whese livelihaad depended ou the running of the twa mille. Sir James was net in humsef a bard man. His !amuly knew him as a good husband, and an Indulgent father. Charitable organizations claseed him iu their private lists amongst the \"fair ta liberaL\" Nom was hie a man of narrow outloak. H-e dlvided contra in several large business undertakings, and was known by his colleagues as far-seeing and broad-minded. Hie dutyto-,day wae a painful one; but he kuew that the 'origin o! it did net lie wlth bhinself-the cause was acrass the seas, six thousand miles away. Rhead, general manager af the Bank, met hlm in the earlyaftertoon at tlie Brunten station, and 8ped By MAX RITTENBER G \"Great Victory! Ten thouaand killed!i\" thoughts frein wishes.\" \"-and cloelng out the mille would mean a, great blow te the district-winter is coming on-I have ta live here.\" There was a whole volume of meaning compreseed into those two last simnple statements. S JR JAMES uodded a sober understanding, and answered generously: \"The responsibility will *be entirely mnife. You can let that be k.nown.» In th~e fashion of the North, no open word of thanks was mnade, but the mana\u003eger's relief was manifest ln his features. It would not be pleasant ta have tu live amongst ruined mlll-owners and starving opera- tives, who miglit accuse him of bring'lng about their misery. For Sir James, residlng Ia London, the mat- ter was on a different footing-the footing of cold, impersonal coinmercialism. Hie decision ýonce mnade, he could return ta his home and shut hb1s ears to the human consequences. Beveral hours were spent in a concentrated ex- amnation of the papers prepared by the general man- ager relative ta the affaire of John Owtrama and Son, the Owtrami Mill, Brunton, and David Glenn \u0026 Ca., the Brookside Mill, Shapworth. At length the Chairman straightened hinseif wearily. \"Botih ouglit to go,\" he said. Rhead cauglit at the conditional \"Ought to go--- yes, in strict business. But that wauld bit the towns very bard. And winter comrxng on-if you could spare one of theni? The war can't last far ever. Too flerce ta last long. Afterwards-' \"Spare w'hlch?\" \"Glenn, I think.\" \"Well, l'mn a Shapworth man myseif.\"l \"He's a decent fellow.\" \"And Owtram?\" \"I've nothlng particular against Owtram. He's bard, of course, but a man of bis word. And bels done a good deal for his worivpeople-the Owtrain model village and all that.!' \"Drive me round ta the twa milîs.\" \"«Shall I telephone to say yau're caming?\" \"No-I shall not go -inside.\" The manager called foer bis car, and iu tbe 9 of the late afternoon they drove through the t' towns. Opposite the ba .nk preniises was the Bru\" Town Hall, a gloomy building, almost dead-bl with accumulation of soa)t. Corintihian in its for] design, but entirely laçking lu, the Greek grace ness, as though the atinos\u003eph'ere of commercialt had coarsened it and killed the spirit o! the orîgl thought. At the base -of the building 'were1 marble lions receutly washled -vbite, and loaltiui contrast alnost rldiculously meek. The mercantile centre of the îtowu, gloomY substantial, was quickly left behind, and they 'w lui the region of tbe factories, and rçiws of l dweflings, hopeles-siy alike, and criss-crossing ral, lnes, thrusting out tentacl \u003ces et track ta grasP trade o! works and coal-yards. Tile street hun' over a narrow canal -of dead water, greasy, lildesc water, fianked by a vista of square-cut cbunCs factory-buildings witb innumerable windows, s( yellow with lights, others black and Ulfelese. Rbead poiuted along the vista. \"lTwo years there were liglits lu every window, and smoke f every ci1mney,\" hie said. \"Boom-timne and slump,\" commented the Gbairri \"Why dan't men learu the lessons 0f the past?\" T HE street became a road bordered by oddmetý fields wiltb dleplrited grass and better el dwellings struggling bravely ta rear gardern tbe atinosphere a! miasma. Presently a huge-sque building loomed through the twilight, grey, its monster chimneys striking strangeiy enougli, the note of attistry in the splayed hideousness of the grimage. Sir James had the car siawed to a waib pace. \"The Owtram model village ?\" he asked. \"Just beyand the mill.\"1 Tbey aecended a sligbt, Incline into a regiofl grey-stone, grey-tiled cottages, fiank ta flank lu after row, their square fronts flush to the paverri eacli with its two steps leadIng ta the entrance2 d and its one parlour wlndow on the ground-fioar filled wlth geraniuni or sombre aspidestra. TI~ villas were cleaner than the workmen's dwellijlgI the more cenýtral part of tbe town, but otheri there was Uitile ta dietinguish theni. \"Why caîl it a mode]. village?\" ýaeked Sir Jamne \"ItIs well regulated. Gwtram has a long sel ruleit for the tenante, and keeps them. strietlY Ue . . . And that's the Helen Owtmam meuno hall, bulît ln unemery o! hie wi!e.\" The hall was conceived by the same mmnd that designed the cottages. It wae Plain, substan bopelessly unlnsplred and uninspiring. \"Drive on,\" said Sir James. The roaçi plunged inte brie! country, and t quickly revertad to a narrow, higb street of ano1 manufactur4ng village. And se they passed, by connective tissue of milI snd womkmen's, cottages petty shaps, Into the twin town of Shapworth. \"lThat's Brookoide Mill,\" poiinted out Rhead. Another huge prison-lieuse loomed out of the nl Around It weme rows of huddled cottages, thîs t in med brick, red-tiled. \"A shade less hopeless,'e mused Sir James. \"There's the recreatien park. Glenn estarted Idea, and raised suliscriptions for lt.\" The dark trees of the park were silently shedÉ their leaves ta a sluggish, tired breaze. A factomy heoter boomed aut the note of ever release, and a mo- ment later, it seeni- ~ ed, a scurrying crowd of men and women were gorglng the streets, the noise of their dloge waklng a myriad celioes. \"All those,\" eald Rhead. \"And the winter coming on! Sir James' mauth was a straight line. He gave no answer. The two men dlned i soberly at the bousef of the manager and hie 'wife. No word o! business passed durlng the meal. Afterwards t h e y smoked lu silence, ý and retumned by car ta t he shuttered bank premses at î Bunton. men elane,\" sald Sir (Conéluded on P. 16.) David Glenn, of Shapwor,",
         "FAMOUS BOWLERS AT NI1AG AR A WiIIi80n (Canada Rink), the Most famous bowler ln Canada, defeatina the famous John Rennie (Granite) 13-10. R. H. Brydon, from Gueiph, waa defeated by Dr. Crawford, fromn the Ferfllesgh Rink, Hamilton, 17-7.. N IAGARAONTI-eLÀKÈ forgot the sound of the buliast week when the annual bowling tour- nament of the Ontario Bowling Association pltched lis marquees in the mllitary town. Several of the most eminent players from Ontarlo gave the tournament a tinge of human Interest. Sir John Willison, eminent journalist, la equally famous as a bowler. In the semni-finals of the Association Match ho 'beat Dr. Paul, froîn bis own rlnk (Canada), 14-13, and la the final tussle with Mr. John Rennie (Granite) he won out by 18-10. In the Consolation finals, President Creelman was beaten by Dr. Paul, 16-15. The honour went to, Hamilton \"Fernieighs\" and the \"Canadas,\" from Toronto. Dr. Paul (Canada\u003e defeating Prealdent Creelman, of the 0. A. C., Guelph, by a narrow squeak of 16-15. Guelph was badly beaten more than once. GREATEST BATTLE 0F THE WAR By NORMAN PATTERSON closed only w'hen the plains were fieoded and Dix- mude a heap of ruine. Then camne the Battle of Ypres. The beet short description o! it bas been given by a French eye- wdtness, and appeans la the London Times o! June 24th. Here it le: THE BATTILE 0F YPRES. Ythe laet week of October the attack on thje \"B Ythree passages had slatkened, andthe bl Ypres. The little city bad ne value in itsel! and It commanded ne main hlghway to the coast; but the salient est of it seeme te have exerclsed la the Ger- man' -ligh Commnand that pecullar illogilcal attrac- tion w'blch salients; po5ess. In the battie of Ypres, which began on Octeber 20 and ended on November 12-the greatest battie Of the war, and perhaps the greatest as yet la human bistory-the Brltieh Army held most of the line. They hbad on the whole the heaviest fig'hting, for they held the meeqt critîcal points-the front o! the sallent at Gheluvelt and the southern re-entrant on the Klein Zîllebeke rldge. This, 1 tjhink, our generous Allies -would acknowledge; but it is fair te add that 'wlthout Frencb assistance that atternoon the charge of the Worcesters relieved Ghieluveit, our position on the sallent was Intact. \"«A second Instance le the superb fight of Dubois's 9th Corps, whlch held the Une from Zonnebeke.to, Blxscheote wlth the ald of Bldon's, Territorial Divi- Mions and part of De Mitry's 2nd Cavalry Corps. He ~had to face the bulk of the four new German forma- tions which had been first launched against the British, as well as the left wing of the Wurtemberg Army on the Yser. SIGNIFICANCE FOR THE ALLIE$. battis of Ypres, apart from. is strateglc im- 'T H-'Eortance, wiîî always occupy a epecial place among tihe batti fteswr neretreat from Mons, at the Marne, and at thec Aisne we had our Allies on each side of us, but at, Ypres we ilngled with them, and'each learned at close quar- ters the prowvessi of the ether. We are still fighting there In conjunction. He who visite that blood- stained salient to-day will see as xnany French as Britishi troopeon the road from Poperlnghe. He wUJI hear theà French 'Z5mm. guns speaking beside the English 18,pounder, and see the lean, brown, tirail- leurs moving alongslde -the eolid British Infantry. At Ypres thýere began that new respect and admira- tion between the Allies whlch. cornes only to eye- witnesees. The three-weeks' battle was in a sense a more significant achievement than the Marne. It marked the defeat of the second great Germali off ensive. It ceet the enemy a quarter of a million mnen. It inaugurated that wlnter stalemate whlch bore more hardly on Germany than on the Allies, and which gave France time to reorganize her levieB and supplement her reýsources. It also establlehed finally-îf there had ever been any doubt of It-the supreme military talent cf General Joffre and Gen- eral Foch. The French reserves were net yet ready, but General Joffre managed to collect reinforcements vihen the caîl came. Apart from the new armles holding thé front, be sent up durlng the actual fight- ing not lees than flve Army Corps by rail and moter. It was Foch's task to inake his scanty reserves go as far as possible, placlng a division bore and a division there, as the stress of battle altered. Only under the most brîlliant Ieading could bal! a million mien between Albert and the \"ea bave beaten off at least three tlxnes thelr aiumber.11",
         "10 TRE COURIER. HOW TO WIN THE WAR TH IE MONOCLE MAN WE might as wall settla down te a long w-ar. The camblnatlon. o! new armies aud new Allies, \"spriug drives,\" and Austrian cal- lapses, which was to give ues the victory this summer, seems largaly ta have faiied ta couneet. Italy did camne In. She came ln with rare courage and a fine ehivalry when the Garmans were winnlng in GalilaI. But ehe came in sione. As I write, Rau- mania bas not .yet decided-Bulgarla ls stiil the- Un- turned \"key\", ta the Ballkans--Greece, though lber people voted pluikl and setrongly for wsr, is sitili tander tbe gavernment wblceh replaced that of Veut- zelos. And It le idle te deny that the presence of a great Austro-Germau army on tbe, bordera of Rau- mania and the new Albanian complications have created a lissa favoureible situation for the Allies In the Near East. T HIS aIl looks as If 'w-eshould get ne \"snap verdict,\" this summer. Ail the nations are prepsning for anothar w-inter campaigu in spite of the general belief amongat those of us wba stayed ut home tbat the sufferings of st 'wInter lu the trenches wauld forbid a repetition. The blood of the belligerents is up; and they w-i net hesits.te before thte harrors of a second or aven a tbird winter In the water-soalpd trenches. Notbing 'will now stop the war except thfe decisive defeat of ana of the oppasIng groups. And thut does not look ta be very near. As for the Allies, they cun nover accept defeat, no matter how many temporury reverses their forces may meet in the field. As for the enemy, they 'cann-ot be permitted ta secure a truce wbile w-e stili are witbout visible rand undeniable proof of aur military superilorfy over tbem. For sucit a truce would neyer biassom into real peace, biut wauld cover a breathless race by al parties in fresih preparattons ta renew the confiict. %W %U w S 0 w-e muet settle dawn ta win tbe war. It le quite true that lu the language o! the aId music hall ditty, \"w-c have tbe mon, w-e bave the ships, and we have the iley too.\" But we might as w-eh realize first au lest thut titis potential supanionity ln meu sud Money Will net be \"1taken as read.\"1 We must produce the men and maney, couvert tbe :ftrst Iuta soldiers and the second into munitions, and set tbem up over against the enemy's tronches w-hora the Garmans cannat fuil ta be aw-arc of tbem. The statisticiens have wan many wars; but tbey will not win this one. We muet produce tbe goods ÇAnd, if this là truc, w-e ought ta \"ýget busy\" ln genuine coin- mercial stylo ta produce the moat \"gaods\" lu the sbortest possible time. O UTR country's growtb ls belng stunted w-bile this destructive w-ar rages. 'We are losing money, losing settlers, losing seme of the best imni- grants w-e have aecured Iu the past, lasing many of aur awn most promising sons, losing preelous years of w-bat we w-are w-ont ta cail \"Cauada'a Century.\"1 And we shahl net gat on te rails ugain and begin ta maya forw-ard until w-o have finishied w-ith tbie ob- structive w-ar. This lu the Job that les righit ln front of us. Our national train has been held up by a farmidable land-siide squaraly across the* tracks. And it is pitiabla tifin te sIt back in tbe parleur car, conning a-ver the '\"business as usual\" plans whicb we wili put Into aparatian as Soan as the train movos ou once mare and w-e reaob aur destina- tions It may not maya on for years if we ait still. It may neyer maya on again on aur rails, if enough of us sit still. We must ail pile out and arganize ourelves into an emergency brigade af track- clearers, and \"0mâke the dirt fiy.\" The sooner we finish the w-ar, the sooner w-ill 'w-e have 'real and remunerative \"business as usual.\" The longer we let the w-ar dIl an, tbe mare complote will be the collaýpse o! aur \"business as usual.\"1 O ROANIZE! Thbat is the word. Wa are now treating this w-ar as If it w-aea holiday per- formance w-hich soae of us w-ould like teail0e and whicb tbe rest o! us are w-llling that they should. Wel are sayinig ta aur fellaw--Canadians-\"-OGolng ta the gs\u0026me this war?\" And -those of us who an\" going, proceed wlth our ordinary occupations amusements as much as usual as we Ian mal We tbink that we are \"Idoing our bit\" 'w-heu wE cheaper golf balle or decide to wear lest sfl suit. Thtis will neyer doý-'uless we are prepar, have utterasnd entire ruini descend upon aur ««J paradise\"l some dan, as ruin rushed -dewn on Loti We must organize this entire, country te bning i a swift, sure and linal finish to the war. A N earnetfaced young officer sat In mY te otiber day and madle some suggestions ' iniglt help recruiting. They were pra\u003c suggestions growing out o! the difficuities whic had to meet persionally as a recruiting officar. of the things be sald struck me particularly. shouldn't the men ln an office or a factor, hoe al \"agrea ta divide between them the work of such amongst them as are 'w-1lling and able ta go tx front? Suppose thay did have ta corne Iback n ta do thim extra work. Whait Is that ta sleeping L tranches and risking deathi or mutilation or prisonment? They 'wll go home after their WO done ta warm houses, and comfortable beds rand meale, wbile their cbumsl will seek, shelter In i -sheds, sleep on wet àtraw, and eut wheu tiheir ra can reach them.\"' W ELL, why not? That wouid keep the valiiel Job for him in the surest 'passible way, a would enable bis employer ta Jet hlm go out mi-sgiving. Why should one man at a des asked ta give up everyithlng, 'while bis desk- gives up nothilng? It is as much te war of the athmxe as the war of the men who go. We ai hn it because we do not think that we would like Canada after the Germans had landed aud ' a li!ttle \"frightfulne-se,\" to teach us ta be terne, establisbed the splked helmet as the ruling for, what Is now a free country. Aigainst such a fati wauld ahl flght-if we could effectively. And we Some of us have the youth and healtb ta fight il trenches. But, if we are tai wln this war, the re us must be wlIhin.g ta bie organlzed by the Goyern ta, f1gbt industrially-to figbt eommercially-to in lany corner we can fill-td fight; for our own frai and the future of this Canada aud ail the world laves liberty. THE MONOCLE MA IS THE OTTAWA OPPOSITI ON ALIVE? By JOHN A. COOPER AFORTNIGHT ago, an article entied d\"Us the Ottawa Gavernment Alive?\" appeared in this newm journal. Thoro was no Intention at the time of writlng a companlon article under the titie \"ls the Ottawa Opposition Alive?\" But clrcumetances alter cases and aisa the intentions of wrlters on publie affaire. Two reasans have arisen ta campel this article. The Ottawa \"4Free Press,\" ane of the first four Liberal papers in Canadla, devated a column of ts edi- tonial space ta comment on that article. The editor quated fram Ut with warm appravai, yet ln a non-partisan spi rit. 1But the editor of the \"Free Press\" omitted ta reprint ane phrase whlch tan thus: \"SUr Wilfrid Laurier and hie lieutenants are apparently lalling in their arm-chaire and allowing national affairs ta drl\" The editor of the \"Free Press\" might reasanably have quated that phrase and driven home the lessan which it contairied. As a leading Liberal writer ho is entitled ta givo advice ta his party. lndeed, it is hie duty ta help keep his party leaders ta thelr wark. Here was a golden apportunity which he miased. The second reason is the receipt of a letter froni a prominent Liberal, a member of the House of Cammans, sking what the Liberai leaders couid do, except through a coalition cabinet. He considers that a coalition le unhlikely, and that Sir Robert Borden wiii not ask the Liberais ta join any officiai com- mittees, therefore ho le sincereiy anxiaus ta knaw what the Liberal leaders could do. la it not llkely, he suggests, that if Sir Wilfrid Laurier and hie colleagues tried ta do anything, thoir miotives wouid be mlsjudged? Unider these circumetances it seems necessary ta point aut that Canada ils Taoking ta the Oppasitian as weli as te the Governmenit te bring the Ship o! State aafeiy through the traubled waters. Further, if the Opposition has more fear of a snub from Sir Robert Borden or Hon. Mn. White or Hon. Robert Rogers than It has a desire ta aasat the nation in this atruggie, then the Oppo- sition i. unworthy of Its calling. This le no time ta study a boak on etiquette. rhis ls net the hour when men are te stand on their dignity. The tiret duty cof every citizen, whether his namne be Laurier, Graham, Pugsloy, Smith or Brown, whothen ho be member of Panliament or a mechanic, is \"ta do hie bit,\" 'ta do It willingly, freely and counageousiy. Sir Wilfrid Laurier has been alient. Have he and hic coileagues beon intimi- 'dated by the Cabinet Ministers who rule or micrule in the seats of the mighty? Are the Libenal leaders afnaid of a scornful snlff from smre politician, termi ponarlly in chargo of a Cabinet portfolioa? Sorne of them were Cabinet Min- itens once and know hew iittle te bo foarod le a Cabinet Minister's mcorn. If the silence is mot duo ta this fear, thoni ta what la it duo? Did Lord Derby wait until Mr. Asquith asked hlm ta organize the dockers at Livorpeol? Not likoly. Lard Derby knew those dockers and had watched themn ail hie days. That was hie bit and ho saw it himeîf. Did John Redmond ask Mr. Aequith's permission ta make recrulting speeches ln Ireland? Net likely. Mn. Rodmond know Asquith was busy, and that evory patriotic citizen had a pioceoef work ta do. Ho saw his bit and ho wont eut te de IL Did Bon Tillet go aven ta Franco te see conditions at the front first hand because Mr. Asquith toid hlm te do se? Net likoiy. Bon reaiized that as a labour leader he muet know the truth and.- bear the mescage ta hie fellow- Ho saw hilut and ho went and did it. Did Mr. Rowel, leader cf the Ontario Oppasition, wait until Sir Ri glorden or Premier H-earst aeked him to go out and tell tho public in a i af epeeches why Canadiane ehouid fight agalnst German autocracy and Gel frightfuiness? Not a bit of it. Ho eaw hie duty, and ho has been out it in Nova Scatia, Saskatchewan and Alberta, and hiseoxpensea are noti paid by any Government or any~ party. Did Mr. Gauit and Sir Clifford Sifton and Sir Donald Mann and Sir Eaton and Mr. Huntley Drummond and Sir Adam Bock wait until sonme aeked them befare they contributed af their wealth to assist Canada in great struggle? No. They are volunteere in the work, and ail the marei ta them becauseof that fact. ~Why ehould flot Sir Wilfrid Laurier, Mr. Pugeley and Mr. Graham anc Maclean and Mn. Macdonald, Dr. Clark and ail-.the ather Liberal leaders i active in making recruiting speeches as Hon. Arthur Meighen? Why si they not be discuesing means ta relieve the unempioyment problem v, Canada will again face in October? Why should they not help ta orgi bande oS young men ta go West and holp garner the greateat wheat ha the Prairie Provinces ever saw? Why ehouid they net heip ta salve problem of gotting 800 grain veseels ta take aur surplus crop acrosi Atlantic in the autumn? Why should they not help te organize the man turers and the mechanies wha might make munitions oS war, but wha arg yet doing so? Why chauid they not be active leaders in collectlng pati funds, Red Crocs supplies, mator ambulances, and ail the other requl which the people are wiliing ta suppiy? Why mhould thoy not help Ir' wark of caring for wounded and convalescent soldions returning froni front? They have mat besen wholiy Inactive, but the general impressian le,' they are \"lying low\"l and perfecting thoir politicail organikation for emerger This is a national oriels, and upon every citizen there i. a duty laid. i overy member af Parliament thore la a heavion duty than upon the pr citizen. It matters not whother that memben b.e Liberai or Conservati' Independent, ho ie expected ta heip lead the nation ln this, the moat stroni period of its histony. Whon the struggle le aven and the battle won, glory wiii be apportioed according ta the effort and the sacrifice. To the Liberal membere oS Panliament who may think that they ail called upon ta do more than keep silence, lot me commend the woil Ici sentiment which appears evory day in the editorial page of the TOI ,,Globe\": \"Vour King and Country need you.\" The \"Globe\" dld not wai Sir Robert Borden ta ask it te use that phrase daiiy. AIl conventionalities, ail precedents, and ail[ social or pelitical usages -_A -. . a __ý R _ -- A \u0026. mas a The and tnc pool Se lang m dutioc s0 w are apparent",
         "THE COURIER. PICTURE-STORIES WITH FEW WORDS Characteristic Scenes of War from the Eastern and Western Fronts A GIANT RUSSIAN AEROPLANE THAT DID GR EAT THINGS. his Sikorsky bi-plane, ,weighing 3 tons,'as heavy, as a motor-truck, recentiy went aloft over the German lunes along the River San with a quarter a ton of explosives. The mark aimed at by the SIlav bi-piane was a number of German trains, one of which was filled with artlllery sheils. The mn was s0 accurate that one train wvas expiodedwith 30,000 sheils on board, and a long stretch of the railWay was destroyed. Lieut. Baske, who commanded this aerial bombardmeflt, declared that the marksmanship of hi. bi-plane makes a record in aviation warfare. BRINGING IN GERMA number of Teutonlo casi district i. one of the tho E WESI y in the Service.",
         "THE COUJRIER. THE CA NA DIA N C OURIER PUBLISHED EVERY SATURZDAY DY COURIER, PRESS, LIMITED lai SIMCOE ST. ED1TED DY JOHN A. COOPER TORONTO, JULY 17.1915 A n Expanding Empire B OTHA bas added German South-West Africa to, the Empire. This, witb additions la the East Indies, must be placed as an asset agalnst ail the liabilities the Empire la assumling. Futher, theso eventa eniphasize the tbougbt that the world of to-morrow wlll be qulte different from the world of yesterday. Net only wlll the map 'of the world be redrawn, but thora wlll be vital changes la ides of govarament, In economies, la social phllosophy, and in religilon. The remapped world wlll bo oven- owept wlth new tboughts, new Ideas and new con- ceptions. The Canadian'Hindus CANADIAN Hindus and Sikhs are rallylng to the colours. -A few days ago a Sikh resident in Toronto recelved a latter from bis fathor in India, a man of seventy-fivo, telllng hlmi that ha must enllst at once. The father tbroatanod that If the son dld not do so, ho hlmself would again join tbe forces. The son obedlently and gladly enrolled la the MlsslaMuga Horse. Non is ha the first recruit. Thase men from His Majesty's Dominions la Asia are showing a loyalty and a devotion whlcb no other Canadian can surpass. How Lucky MEN May declare Dr. Montague la a political heodoo and inake other dlsparaglng namarks, Ibut Dr. Montagne is ona of the lucklest o! the lucky. Just as ho 'was broken la health and la serions polltkcal trouble at Winnipeg, and wbea he was 'wonderlng day by day what would happen to hlm, be gets archers to report for modical duty la England. Can it be bes.ton? No doctor should go ýto the front, 'where the work is severe, unless lie la ln perfect bealtb. Yet the anthorities overloolv that and \"order\" hlm to report. While on activa service, bae will not 'ba worrled with aay summonses or other blue papes sed by the royal commissions of Manitoba. Yea, be may bave pleasant chats wltb Dr. Simpson, wbo Is also at the front, concernlag the contents of the famnous safety deposît box. Wbo la golpg to order Sir Rodmoad anld bis other colleagues to the front. And wbat about Kelly, don't tbey need hlm? Rifle W] be an portani 22rd, machir \"The able w seded unnece leave flot more than 50,000 wlrose occupations are stili desultory. Hence the number of mnen avallable for barvest is flot great. The first step bas been taken by -the Militia De- partment, wbich proposes to allow enlisted men a montb's furlougb to work in the harvest fields if they so desire. Just bow far the men will care to exchange the rifle for the pitch-fork is a matter for speculation. But certainly the suggestion is excel- lent. The Provincial Governments in the West wîli probably make an appeal to the men in the towns and cities to go out and belp the farmer with bis crop. If this appeal is properly made, witb a patri- otric turn to it, it should be effective. No \"farm help\" excursions from the East to the West have yet been announced, but wiIl probably be held as usual. Hon. Martin Burreil bas no doubt used bis influence in this direction. The Dominion Minister of Agriculture may be relied upon to do what is necessary and do it in time. Limits to Germah Advance AST week i-t was polnted out that the Germans Lwere advancing AWAY from tbeir ammuni- tion and the Russians TOWARDS their ammu- nition; and that in the end geography would have its way. Now we see that geography wins again, as it won when the Germans advanced on Paris and when tbey mnade theirfirst sWeep to Warsaw and Ivangorod. ':' German strategy, is an attack ln force,, well pressed home. If their opponents do not retire the Germans sweep over them. But If their opponents retire, promptly, as the French a.nd British did last August and the Russians -did recently In Galicia, tben the German rush wears ltself out. It wears- out because the big guns and tbe ammunitien are gradually left bebiind la the swlft advance. For the present Russia Is safe, and even Warsaw Is sate. It will take thé Germans a long time toi accumulate the men, ,the guns, the ammunition and the transport for another sncb rush. And In the meantime the Grand, Duke Nicholas will make sane couinter mnoves, whlcb wlll be more pleasing to the Allies and less encouraglng to the Tentons. Russia, witb ber line unbroken, is once more wltb her back to the wall, and that wall consists; of rail- ways runnlng parallel witb ber figbting front, of big guns in and around buge fortresses, and of ammuni- tion supplies recently accumulated. True, Galicia Is retaken, but the Austrians and Germansbave per- manently lost 400,000 soldiers In the campalgn of recapture. Besides tbis terrific permanent sacrifice of troops, tbey have used np their accumulated stores of ammunition. Let us not forjeet that the Teuton armies are de- cllnlng ln strengtb, while the Alllod armies are lncreaslng. Sir Robert to, the Rescue APPARENTLY among tbe matters whlcb Sir Robert Bondon will take up wltb the Hgome authoritias during bis visit abroad is the shortage of ships to carry our crop acnoss the Atlan- tic. This is a matter wbicb Sir George Foster si bave attended to, but Si r George preferred to, t, month's bolidays -in New Brunswick. Since George became Minister of Trade and Commer( seems to be enjoying Ille immensely. Notbing ries hlm very mucb. So Sir Robert bas taken ul work bis colleague does not care to, do. Sir Thomias Shaughnessy bas also been instri by the British Government to assist in the soi, of tbis trying situation. Sir Tbomas will ende, to charter boats to supplement the present fr service on botb the Atlantic and the Pacific. Witb the Premier of tbe Dominion and the 1 dent of Canada's greatest railway corporation ing on the job, sometbing will be done. Our export tbis autumn sbould reacb 200,000,000 buE Figuring 500,000 bushels to a ship, thore woul 400 vessels required. Or if a sbip takes half v and haif package freigbt, 800 vessels would be Bl sary. Supposing that tbe period o! sbipme, twenty weeks, tbis would require 40 sailings a 'ç It will thus be sean that the task is by no iir insignificant. Thera is one bopeful featura--Great Britaifi be as anxious to get tbese foodstuff s as Canada sand' then?. Therefore we are likely to bave able co-peration in London from Lord Selbo comimittee wbicb bas full charge of Brit food supply, Beware the Knocker ANU-MBER of people in Canada are kno( the Allied causa. They profoss syif and hope for ultimate vîctory, but shake l4aads ov.er present conditions. Some o! thesf visi-tors from Englaad, and tbey add stories 1 Russia, wantIng to maka peace, and about Fr not being too enthuslastic, and so on. 1 Canadians who bear tbese- atonles sbould them as tbey deserve. Nor sbould thay be nopne The« Allies, accordlng to, the best Information, absolutoly united and datermlned. The wor crushing Prussian milltary autocracy is greater was antlclpated, but vlctory is certain. The taý braaklng tbrongb the Dardanelles is one wlhicli test the Allies' resources and bnavery, but~ st prograss is belng made. Let us not forget that flgbt is being carriedon far from the Allies' b and that tbe natural difliculties are as great a, Japanese faced at Port Arthun. The loss of Gý Is a great loss, but it is better to bave won and than neyer to, bave won at aIl]. Galicia is less u to the Teutons now than it was before the Roi occupation. -Its fortifications and oll wells and veat fields are out of commission for some tIn coma. Confidence la the first elemant In victory, every citizen must do bis bit In maintalnlng- confidence. Even tbougb yon feel a shade dl pointed, refuse to show it. Faint boart neyer fair lady, and the British militany forces have al' won the last battie !n any groat war In whch Empire lias evor been engagad. This war bs exceptional in evory respect, and expectatlons must be exýceptional also. ELECTRIC RAILWAY TRAGEDY AT QUEENSTON HEIGHTS LASI ze Canadiana la Rosa rifle tom- ers little. It wll1 but o! minor im- lament, on Jupe àat the German led the rifle. the most formld- ive olmost super- 'endered the rifle MEri for the Harvest CANADA wll not bave any too mnany men to garner her promlslng bar'vest. Last wlpter ýthore wera large numnbers of unemployed. About 150,000 mon have enllsted, of whom one-half have already left the country. About 75,000 are arn- ployed ln makdng munitions 0f war. This would Visitors f rom Toronto vlewing the. curve wIi 170 Sunday-school plçnicers froîp To\u003eronto, teen lives were lost and scores more or 1cmi investigated, but the, great cause of it, asid almost a double load. The point where tht where a vialtor Is examlning the. spot. « taken tilt the",
         "THE COURIER. IG N 0F TH E MA PL E PARTMENT MAI NLY F 0 R W 0 M E N Lie Play-timne of the Year years ago, a f ew of the very wisest citizens *he world Dut their ýsagaclous heads together sald that there must be public playgrounds city children, where they may have that lity to exercise lungs and limbs, for which. 3tural child craves. On a day, whicb was Jiune's few perfect exhibitions of what the %ith of the year can do, I notlcedl the crowds Of thèse Toronto playgroundýs, to be con- ,hat they are one of the best Makers or (0f Canada that we possess. The youngsters ilng the -best of good tiines, and many a jaded Of large means and little leisure niight have beir building of casties in the sand or that ed aclilevement of \",hep Scotch.\", Ineed a. play time, and we nead it more In LI, wya evr r did, before. Someone will say: $s! Thiink of aur soldiers and what they S!\" It ls Just because our soldiers set us an t exaniple in this inatter that we venture to that the sùmmer sbould have a play-time oua 0 f us5. The. men lu the. tranches fight Leu tbaey are iu the midst of the fray-but Voeriest e3chooIýboys for fun and frolic wben ýY are out of them. That etory of bow the 31f Festubert went slnging, and laugbing ta liard fight brings a choking sensation to the 'but It shows us the way ta win victories at Don't let us forget the play-Uime of the yaar. Patriotismn in the Yukon Vancouvar, July 9tb. eall of the Empire, which bas 'been beard i answered by womeu ail over Canada, bas no0 part af the country met with a more r enerous response than that which bas arn its furtbermost territary. Upon the do- ' Of war, the women of Yukon rallied for luidar the' leadership of Mrs. Black, wlfe of uflissioner of the territory. Wesan, the capital city of Yukon, thare were Pters of the Daug'hters of the Empire wbich Il organized by Mrs. Black during the early r lier ragime at Gaverumeut House, and it \u003e11gh tbem that the flrst cail for women's helP hou Mrs. Gooderham telegr\u003ephod ta Mrs. hking that tbey help to raise the fund which ende4 for the, purchase of a hospital slip. ý1Y the inambers of thé Dr. George M. D~awson and the Inspector F. J. Fitzgarald Chapter ta that first eall was ehown iu the amount \u003eOllection taken for that p)urpose, wbich re- 7, the sum of $6,460. ý inauguration of the Canadian Patriotic Fund kraissioner af the territory requested the two Ste undertake to raise a contribution toward ~a mueeting of the axecutive of the Yukon SFund, hald In Decem-ber, Mrs. Frank on01 behalf of the menibers of the twa chap- ters, handed to the coml- mittee $6,716. As the war progressed À and the full realizatiflu of its magnitude came home ta the people, and the ueeds of the soldiers- and thase de- pendent on them became better known, the interest of many women not con- nected wltb the Daughters of the Empire becamfe en- iisted, and tbrougb the efforts of Mrs. Black the Women's Patriotic Servi-ce League of Dawsoni was formed with a large mnem- bership of enthusiastiC workers who bave since met rogularly at Governmant Houso. The Commissioner's wife, who bas beau a leader lu al the patriotic movemeuts lu which the women of the ter- ritory bave ongagod, bas the distinction among YukoflOrs af being a \"Sour-Dough,\" a term applied to the piahlOors Wife of the Commisia of \"The Land af the Mid- o u uterottr nigbt 'Sun.\" She weflt taofaruthmoter that littie known land with ber brother, Mr. George M. Muager, 'wltb the great rush of gold-seekors, in 1898, makIng ber way on foot across the Chilkoot Pass and experienciflg many tbrilllng adventures, flot the least MRS. COLIN SEWEL. Preuident of the Red Cross Society of Quebec and an earnest worker lIn ail forma of patrlotlc endeavour. Mrs. Seweil is here photographed wlth her two grandeons. o! which was the runuing lu a smail bat of the tur- hulent waters of Miles Canyon and the Wbitehorse rapide. Five years later Miss Mungar marriad Mr. George Black, a native of New Bruswick and a member o! an aId United Empire Layallet family. Not long after ber marriage s-he left Dawson, but raturned after a few yaars' rasîdence lu othar parts 0f Canada upon the appointment of ber husband ta the Coni- missionership o! the territory, ta take the position of mistress of Governmfent Hous', the officiai rosi- douce malutainad lu Dawson by the Pederal Gov- ernment. Mrs. Black le a charming liostees, as many vîsîtors ta Yukon ýcan testlfy. She le a greut lover 0\u003ef ont-o!- door lîfe, a skillful horsewomlaIi and a good shot, and bas accompanied bar ixufband on many fishing and shooting axibeditiohis in the wilds of Yukon. Shle lias won distinction as a botanist o! more thanl ordinary attalamnent. t7htil the present year, mnuch o! ber lelsure was given ta thie stndy o! this science and to research work. Since the beglnning o! the war, boever, ail bar tixue and thought bava been appliod ta patrioticenadeai'our. MABEL DURHAM. A National Service T HE steady growtb and expasion of any organi- zation may genorillY be traced to indiviclnal inspiration rather than to eombined effort. Such hms beau the case wltb the 1. 0. D. E. o! Mont- real and surrounding districts, the motive force ha- hlnd the creation of its many chapters bein~g Mrs. A. W. MeDougald, Provincial Organlzlng Secetary MRS. GEORGE BLACK. ner of the Yukon, under whose leadership the womnen îtory are dolng-their splendid share ta supply the Empire's needs. for Quobec and Standard Boaror of the Order. Iu this splendid 'body of 30,000 womon, wbose motto la \"lmperialism,\" and whose abject ls service tai their country, Mrs. McDougald la an outstandlIng figure, a recognized leader, and an invaluable and earnest worker in every farm of accomplish-meut ut whicb the Ordar aims. Mrm. McDougald, nee Annie Bethune, daughter of the late James Bethuno, Q.C., of Toronto, bas organ- ized ail the Chaptars of the 1. O. D. E. lu Montreal and lu the uearby towns in Quabec Province. The partIcular work ta 'w'icb she bas devoted hersai! lun connation witb tbe Order is the stimulation of the \"entente cordiale\" between the Eugilsb and French- speaking womou of the Province, wtth the rasult tbat since the autbreak of war the two nationalitias are workiug togather Irrespeotive of race or cread for the wellfare of the nation. This ls the end taward wblcb Mrs. McDougald -bas worked for fIve yaars, and It ils due to ber eff orts that this îurther link bas beau forged ln the chalu, of the Empira. Speak- ing lu this counectian at the convention, of the 1. O. D. E., held lu Halifax lu tha latter part of May, Mrs. McDougald sald. \"The ýwomeu of Queboc have 'wlthout distinction o! race or craod for the first time worked togother under the direction of the Daug'btars of the Empire. The good sisters a! the varlous Roman Catholic orders, and the cliuréh guilde of varions Protestant de- nominations bave joiued bauds lu a way tbat bas beau most lnsplring. 1Grat as ls the IntrInsie value of thesa socks, and the Queibec soclis bacome a much prizad article ta tho troupe, f ar groater la it te my mmnd that French and Engllsb women are working tagetihar- as their men ara figliting side by sida with a uaw and deeper meaning of tbe bond of empire.\"' The Womnan Patrols of England 0 F al the activities Into which women have .Jplunged. as a resuit o! the war,, oue of the most naval and most useful. is that of tho Womeu Patrols. Their work is carried ou by a ,,olmittea of tbe National Union'0f Womeu Worlvers, with Mrs. Creigbton as chairman. À Most on- thusiastic supporter ls tbe sacratary o! the Union, Miss Norah E, Green, whom I fauud at the bad- qjuarte 'rs of the organization. lu Parliamaut Mansions, a very smiling, gray-haired youug lady, lu a very busInesglika settlng of iboaks and fyles. 'rWheu the war broka out,\" Miss Green told me, 'ýmany girls batween fourteen and sIxteen campletely last theîr beads. To makre friands wlth tbese girls and help tbem not ta hlinder the men le; the alm of the Patrols.\"1 Thora are now over 2,000 of Vbam lu Grat Britain and lrelund, andi an organizer bas gone ta initiste the work lu South Afrîcu. It îs al voluntary effort excepting lu tha casa of a emall baud of organizers who train the 'workers. The Patreis operate lu the vicinlty of military camps and are chosen f rom dwellers lu thasa neigh- bourhoods. Tbey are 'women -not too old and net too young,\" as Miss Green puts it; tbey always go about lu twos, and never speak ta a girl until they hava 1had a goad training lu tact. A friaudly Word to a feollsh girl hanging about a eamnp, an invitation to coma inta a club where s can learu to do some- thing reslly helpful for the men, or to brlng ber soldier friand into a recreation room, where the \u003cCouclud-ed on page 19.)",
         "THRE COURIER. Courierettes. MILWAUKEE lias put pool tables ln its schools. No doulit tbey wil be more popular than the multiplication tables. Marconi bas lnvented a way to ses tbrougli a atone wall. Now lookc for something to liappen tliose stone walls nt tlie front. Mexico is la tbe tb2roes of a food famine. Wliat of tliat? They'd ratlier figlit than eat down there. We're wilUing to wager tbat .Dr. Dernberg was no more anxious to see England than Fbigland was to sec filini. It seoins clear that American 'boats sbould carry \"Stop, Look and Listen\" signe wbite ln the war zone. Down ia Long Island tbey plan. to, beldi a bomel\u003e' baby sbow. Impossible. Who ever beard of a bomely baby? It ls just a question wbether war dosa not uasettle more tban If can settle. A New York woinan ruslied to the divorce court wben 'lier busbaad spanked bier. The average wonxan would bave reacbed for tlie broom. or the flatiron. Sonie folk\u003cs are awfully coacernied about dodgtng m1crobes, and tlien' thleY'lýl drive 50 miles an bour In a inutor car. A feminlst writem lndignantly asks If women are people. 0f course tbey are, and several klnds o!f people, too. Rockiefeller spent $250 for fireworks the other day. Tlie I. W. W. would gladl\u003e' bave given hlm a fier\u003e' dIspla\u003e' for uotbing. 'Experts report tbat flsbes suifer fromi too inucli air ln the water. Wby flot put t le water tlirough a clothes wrlnger? A Kansas City' marsbal resigned bie- cause lie bad s0 littie to do that lie was asbamed to draw bis salar\u003e'. Chances are that lie intends to, rua for a biglier office. If there are man\u003e' more sucli long waits between diplomatie notes, People may forge-t ahI about the Lusi- tania. Annapolis midshipmnen stated ln ex- aiimnatlon that the\u003e' would take any unfair advantage tliey couhd. Tbat's wbat comes o! reading the war news froin Berlin. Are we dowaliearted? No! The farmers are already sending ln their orders for the 1916 autos. The thlrteentl iInternational naviga- tion coagress lias been called off. Why? Because it was international. The Way I t Wili 8e.-Turkey la said to be anxious te sue for a sepamate peace. The onl\u003e' peace tint Turke.- wlll get wfll be a \"piece\" of Asia Miner. about the size o! a grave for the \"Slck frMa\" of Europe. Many of Tliea.-After this war la over Ut: would be intereatlng to know Just how often \"the worlds greatest battie\" ha. been fought, and Un how mat»' places. A Long Time to Wait.-Â preacher ln Syracuse, N. Y., declares that the time wiII corne wlien there wlll lie no lars ln tIhe world. Well, the world Is (tue to end sometlme. Tht. Old Query.-We note that à, chap named Makepeace la einployed as a military instructor. Wbat's ln a namne? It Mlght Be Worse. Look on the brighter side, my friend, It miglit be worse, you kaow, Your neighbor miglit a trombone play lnstead of a piccolo. Unpopular-Thiomas Edison lias in- vented a searebliglit that wiIl throw its rays for several miles. We ýfancy tbat the great inventor.basearned and will get the undylng dislike of the 0.poony loyers. The Penalty.-Mexico must be good. if she dues not bebave tliète is grave \u003clanger that Uncle Sam will flot speak to ber. War Notes.' The Kaiser seems to think that the band tliat wrecks the craie will rule the world. Italy's army seems te be cap- turing a lot of pretty scenery ln the Tyrol, anyway. 0f course Germany will say it's just the lucli of thie by- stander If neutral ships are sunk. Spain bas declared lier rien- trality. PersonaUy we would prefer to bave ber neutral than au aily. She always gets the worst ut IL. Derniberg says bis visit te America was quite. suiccessful. Probably lie aiean lissf e turu voyage, ýby Br sts h prmi- Sion. England bas forbidden yarn expurts. Are the censors o doing their duty? Woodrow Wilson jýsemst bave the baclibone an'Wlim Je nnings Bryn lias a monopoly of tlie jaw bone. Uncle Sam is talking of rais- ing a vast aviation corps. 0f course tbe whole týhlng Is la the air as yet. The war ay be bard on some of the arts, but no doubt it will stimulate the fine art of dodging taxes. American passengers detained by British warsbips should not complain, but rather offer up tbaaks tbat tbey did not ineet a Gernian submarine. Rivais. The bacli horse seexas to lcnow That lie's no longer \"it\" Wben, speeding to and fro, He sees the busy \"jit.\" Nover Too Late.-Ixi the newepapers we find a tale-o! a couple of lovera wlio bave just made up and marrie-d after a quarrel whlcli tooli place 50 years ago. These littie loyers' spats do de- lay Cupld's conquests at times. TlmeIy.-We note that the army worm. la on the marchinl many parts o! the country. Is this a natural consequence of the belligerent trend of the times? Very Probable.-An auto ln Kansas was climsed by a bullsnalke tliat bit UsB rear tires. It is altogether likely that the machine had been fed with more than gasoline. Theo 00fman Need.--Germany, with the. aid of the Krupp faetory, is putting up a big fight, but what the Kaiser wants now is the invention of a big gun that can be set in the middle of the country ana can fire botli ways at once. Hie Knows.-Judge Alton B. Parkier calîs on the United States to prepare for war. Having run for tbe presi- dency against Teddy Roosevelt lie knows what war is. Resuits Count.-Billy Sunday, the slmngy evangelist, is accused by bis secretary of \"borrowingl bis sermons. Many other preachers bave dune tlie saine tliing, but few with tbe came ef. fect as the ex-bail player. Billy gets results, evea witb tbe borrowings. Which ?-Down la Indiana tliere's a woinan wbo wants a divorce from lier tbirteentb busbaad. Wbat's the mat- ter w1tliher? Is she after a record la -tlie matrimony line or la she Just nat- urally a bad pieker? \u003cAn Oddfellow. Hle ls a most peculiar cliap, Ia bis peculiar way, For lie will not say anytbing If lie lias nought to say. Not Paralie.-\"Marrying a second tJme,\" says a wise Minnesota profes- ani*, \"isa like buying another booki by the saine autbor.\" Not exactly, Pro- fessor. Bookis geaerally bave bappy endIngs. Very LikeIy.-We note that General Ruhlr ias~ been rexuoved from the coin- mand of tbe Austrian army opposing the Italians at one Point. Perbaps bie was all Rolir. Too Lats.e.-Tbe Port Huron 'Times tells bow Arthur Dodge married Agnes Quic in a t ecity. It la evident tbat the young mnan dId not dodge quick enougx. Extremes.-Judge Landis, o! 'Ch!- cago h one years'ago fined tlie stndar-d 011 Comnpany $29,00o,000, fined a 'fariner ,the otber day the anlount O! 2 cents. Tbat judge will ha\u0026ve a liard time xaaking ends meet at that rate. Warm Weather Breezes. -, Tbere were as many amateur Orangemen ia sOrme Canadiani towns un Mona~y as thiere are usually amateur Scotchmen at Scotch pienics. And Uts the ama- teur that keeps up the Interest. you neyer caa tell when lie may, become a professional. Kipling a be a burned-out vo.- cano) when it comes te writing litera- tarel fowadays, but that recmuiting speech lie made la,1t week certs.iaiy takes the Place of an\u003e' stonIes, or poenis lie miglit bave wrltten. Aiuong the man\u003e' tliings that Kaiser Bill used to say tbat lie alow wisdxes lie hadn't, remember tbat cablegram or sympatliy to Kipling wben the poet was i11 la INew York Years ago. Honi. Walter Long says England is now an armed camip, wbereas a fe w miontlis ago It was a land of peace and baystacka. 'Pbat's oni\u003e' a mfld way o! observing what wouid happea to Ger- man iavaders If thosae legen4sry alu- minuai boats ever try te land thein on the coasts of Albion. Wll some one make a mrotion that the 1914-15 musical seq.soa is deflaite\u003e' past, doue, comnplete, and ail over with tili next ýSeptember? ýCarried unani- mious\u003e'. ~ISummiarlzed.-Our impression of William J. Bryan's polie\u003e' la that it mn\u003e' be summed iup as \"Peace at an\u003e' price-exeept",
         "THE COUJRIER. trow Corn s F You Will it don't keep them Dne can't well avoid corns in se days of dainty shoes. But folly to keep thern, pare them 1 doctor them. ý cherniat has invented a way ýnd corna quickly. It is known Blue-jay. Attach it and the n Pain stops at once. Then a of wax--called B \u0026 B wax- sens~ the Corn very gently. In i days the whole corn disap- lawithoutany pain or soreness. t seenis magical. Alter a e-jay plaster is applied, the ,e can't hurt. the corn. After-48 Sns there is no, corn to hurt. olks have proved this on sanie million corna. They are re- ,ing in' this way a million nis a month. rhat's7why corna are flot s0 Imo n as they used to 6e. e-jay plasters came-folks nd theni out-ýand haif the ns that grow today are quiclcly Led by thern. 3 snd 25 cents - et Druggita . SSmplea Mailed Freea ýer \u0026 Blackt, Chicage and New TarI MaIkews of Phyuiciana' Supplies Yreason o f changing \u003ee when in on tis tire '\u0026S itself o f 1lmudA a sline. T. 102 le Lace SThat be.utifui Lace - traiglit frein the 1lnd. ......t lac matr.ar arruggie il nt of their ,g fok -r eniferer.. e gond deada, as well ti. fh.. buook we Completing a Great Tunnel T I-E, construction work upon the Mtount Royal Tunnel lis rap- idly drawing to a close. The excavation tas now almoast comple'ted; the concrete block 1in- in g la over 90% completed, In the soit ground section at the City End, and tbe special twIn tunnel approach to tbe Portai Station, at the back of tbe Mountain, is entirely concreted and readyfor tracks. Soon there will be notblIng left but the concrete lin- ing, track laying, and the installation of electrical provisions and equip- ment, before the Canadian Nortberu Transcontinental trains wfll be findtng their way through Montreal's great natural barrier, into the very beart Of Cauada's commercial metropois. Owing to the war and its resultant induatrial depression, the tunnel work bas, like almost every\u003cthiug ciao of a commercial nature, tbeen somewbat; delayed. It bas, however, neyer stop- ped, and'îtbe most vital portions bave been driven witb redouibled vtgor, due to the peculiar economies required by the times. Perhaps neyer 'before,. at least since the days of slave and con- vict labor, bas bard rock excavation corne out o! a tunnel for conta even approacbing those attained.bere. From the back o! tbe Mountain at flfty-ton steam shovel, operated by compressed air, bas been plowlng Its concrete blocks are erected as the sbIeld progresses, forming a very beavy and substantial tunnel lning as tbe excavation materlal Is re- moved. This sbield lis merely a great false roof of -steel, witb a cutting edge In front, and a tail piece wbicb laps back over the complete masonry. As tbe sbield las sboved abead, on pre- constructed aide and \u003ccenter walls, tbe roof la buhît under tbe tait piece, 50 that the eartb above the roof is neyer exposed or left unsupported. Althougb tbis sbiheld ls peculiarly tnterestIng, witb its almost bumant ma- cbinery and gigantl'c hydraulic pres- sures, often exceeding 5,000,pounds to the square Inch, wbicb are used Iu Its unovement, and apparatus, the atlier end o! tbe tunnel bas the more spectacular Interest. Durlng tbe last few weeks several parties bave been tbrougb this portion of the works. Tbe \"IClty Patbers,\" the Newepapers, Tbe Builders' Exchange, and many otbers, bave all examined the great bore now so rapidly ueartng comple- tion, Wblle visitors are undoubtedly tbrilled wben tn tbe midst of aucli strange and extraordinary surround- ings, It tas luterestiug to note, tbat the thing wbich impresses them mont ta the fact tbat ýso great a work, requir- lng thc excavation . f bundreds. of thousanda of tons of rock, with the DAY'LIOHT AT THE OTHER ENOD. This picture of the Mt Royal tunnel was taken fram about' mldwvay in the tunnel, whlch was Iighted wlth mageslum iare torches. way tbrough the heaped and shattered rock: 151, IanIthe tunnel approacb, near the.,great rock crushlng plant, wbere Mackenzie, Manu \u0026 Go., LiDi' lIed, are piling up stores o! ballast aud graded concrete materlal for tbelr owui work, and for sale to those who wtsli pccullarly bard and durable stone; 2nd, in the tunnel propor, wliere thie shovel advanced ofteu over one bundred feet a day. This was tbe final excavation, clearing up tbe beuches lef t on eltlier side of the tunnel, after lte conter bottom' lead- tng and break-ups \u003cbelng that excava- tion for tbe full size of lte tunnel above the bcading roof) badl been com- pleted. Thus we sec a great flnlsbed bore, thirty feet wlde by twenty odd litgb, reacbtng tnto thie Mountali from thie Model City toward Montreal; under Mount Royal Helghts, Cote St. Cathturtue Road and Outremont; be« neatit th~e old Municipal quarry and uew Outremont reservoir, thte Cerne- tory, Mountain Park and Jook Out, to tbe McGill Coîlege campus. Prom the ca.mpus two practlcally completed tubes extend to 'beyond St. Catharine St., where a sbleld Is slowly forcing Its way through the mlxed geological formation that lies untlQr thal part of the city._ Hoers messre explosion of tbousands of tons o! dyna- nîlte, couild be doine ln tbe midat of a great clly wItbi so little disturbance. War and the Ten Com- mandments, M R. Bryandiscloses that wax vio- lates three of the command- M'entai. Hle objects tai It ou that accaunt and gives notice ta inteudinig war-makers that \"Jehovahls Justice caunot be evaded.\"à But how does Mr. flryan kuow any- thing about the ton cammaudmeuts anud \"Jebovab's justice\"? Read about lem lu the Bible, o! course. And dos lie notice that Moses, who Droduced tbe ton cammaudments, was hlmself a man of no special aversion te war, and that Joshua, bis successor, by express direction of \"'Jéhovah,\" I proniptly walked int thte Canaaniles lu precisely the fashion titat the Ger- mans strove to emulate lu Belgiurn (Deuterouomy 2: 26-37)? There lis precisely tbe same author- ity for war titat there la for te ten commandmeuîs. Tbey corne walking down to us baud lu baud eut o! Jewlsh history,--Llfe. I Keep Absorbine, Jr. t In Your First Aid Cabinet M~ la a depeûndabie prepar- aition for the numerous houseitolti accidents. Ap- plied ta cuts, bruines, wounds and sores, it mnales the part aseptic. kilia the germe and. pro- mnotes rapid heaiing. p 1 t in purely \u0026sblensun cide or menter. ale and is harialees to the mest aensitive tiunes, VISE AXtSORBINE, J\u0026., te retce inflmma- ..oliy venc rgad11 ondlitions -aprains, wrenehes, painful, To raduc. bornai enlargement. andi infiltra- tions. (A.baorbina, in,la a diocutient and reanivent). To allay pain snywhere-ita anodyne affect la prompt andi permantent. Teoapray the thros.t if sors or infeeted-s 10pe ce nt, or 20 par cent. solution of Abiorbine. Jr., ln hosiins andi aoothing andtiT1 dsatroy bac- teri. To heal cuit, braisas, jacerations, sones andi uler. $1.00 4-oz., 12.00 12-oz. bottie at drugists or postpaid. A LIBERAL TRIAL Bormu wiul be sant t. your atdre.. open reeipt of 10o in at\u0026mPa. W. F. YO[UNO PD.P. 282 Lyznans BIdg., Montreai, ~ Should your copy of tihe Courie not r..ch you on Frialiy, advise the. Circula- tion Manager. A new idea for a fascinating dish!e Ice Cream and TOAS TED (10c per Package) Place a cone of ice c.reaml in the dish and smother with Corn Flakes at serving. You wiIl find this deli gh x- fully refreshing. KELLOGG'S CORN FLAKES Made i Canada, at London, Ontario S.\u0026 -À6o 1",
         "THE COURIER. To SIa y a nd to S pare (C oncluded frein page 8.) James. \"'It will bc better for them toi feel that the docîsion le entirely mine.\" At nine o'clock te the minute Job\u0026Y Owtram. entered the private office. It was characteristic of hlm that hie was nel ther before bis time for after his tie. Ho e,,yeer wasted minutes. He wastod nothIng. Hie miii was run on linos of rigid. efflciency. The financial crash in which hie was now involved was not due to bad management of de- tail, but to a trade crisie whîch hie had nlot been farsighted onough to ima- gine and propare for. \"Those damned half-breeds in South America!\" hie told Sir James, speaking ont labis plain blunit fashion. \"That's what's tled me up. There'e nothing wrong with my miii. The cleaneet-run mli In the district. Ab've worked my way up from the loom, as you know, andl Ah'm a practîcal man, wlth every string of my business here.\" He thrust out a bîrýoad flet, palm upwards. \"lCarry me for three menithe until Ah get my money ont of South Amerî-ca-l \"*Yxt will neyer, get it,\" interrupted Sir James. \"Write It off a 90 per cent. lees.\", \"Ah'i1 get that xnoney ont of them if Ah have te stir upý the fleet te go and collect it!\" \"The Gevernment ,will do iethIng for you. There wlll be no Interference on their part. 'You may take that as authoritatîve.\", \"Wel, Ah 'wont. contradiot what yen gay. . Yeu know things about poitics that Ah don't. Ah'm just a plain bus[1- ness man. Now look over these fig- uires, Sir James-\" He drew out a bundie of eheets from hie pocket and began to expeund themn wlth omphasls, 'drlvlng home point after point about the past profits of the mli and the future oxpectations. The Chairman\u0026 llstened te hlmn with patience and courtesy, -but his mind wu$ flot On the figures. That part ef the affair hie hadl already examlned concentratedly dnrlng tlie aftrnoon. le was new welghlng up tha man rather than the money elemont. A T the andi of thre'quarters of an P.heur Sir James reniarkred: \"Mr-. Glaza, of Brookelde MIII, ls te se --me at tan o'ciook on a matter similar to yours,11 \"Ah. thoughit ha was bard bit.» \"The Bank cannot carry both of \"You men that lt's eithor him or mea?\" '.One Ot Yen tWO muet ineet yonr loans.\" John Owtram's bull-dog Jaw bard- onied, andi the glint of battle came Into bie oye. \"Brunton or Shapwerth le it? Look hore, Sir James, your wite WaS Brunton-born. That makas yen In a -way a Brunton man-same as my- self. That must woigh with you sureiy?\" Sir James gave ne answer. \"Yeu wouldn't send theusands er Brunton men andi women to starvation, weuld you?\" pursueti the mill:owner. \"That'e w'hat it mane if yon wont carry me another tbree mnonths. Starvatlon for them. Now Ah've treatati xy workpeople wel. Matie themn a moçdel village, and givon them the Helen Owtram meorial ýhall.\" \"Mr'. GIlenn has given bis People a recreation park,/i \"No--raised the subscription te make il\", \"From My point of viow, the park h.i thoro, anid whether' lie gave the money himseoi or inducati others te give it xnatters nothlng.\" \".Ah'Il back ipy miii against Daviti Glen'n's any day--fer management, eut,,nt, percentage ceets, er any other conlparisen. Mina le the cleanest-run mill in the district, and Ah daty any man te prove the centrary!\" ii1 a et tirawbag~ coenparilsns bo- Jvnsn the tire mille,\"1 iras thaiý quiet V'Thn It'e Brunton or Sbapworth, conveye4 that the. Interview~ wa an endi. IN an enter office, DJavidi Glenn bad been waiting fer a haîf-hour past. That was characteristic et hlm. Theugli the interview was fixeti for ton o'ciock, it iras possible that Sir James *might be disengaged before the heur. ln that case an early coming would save time for the Chairman and anxi- ety fer Élinseif. David Glenn iras a quieter, less soif- confident, much lese dogmatic man than Owtram. There iras even a per- ceptible nervousness in his gait as hae entereti, and in bis voice as hoe 'began te lay 'beforo Sir James the tacts anti figures relative te his 'business. For hiaîf an hour or so the Cbairman listen- ed witb courteous patience, and as be- fore, is niind centroti on the 'Worth ef the man rather than the tacts of his trada. Every big organization is but the iongthened shadow o! a man. Finally Sir James put to hlm the saine test observation hoe bat matie to tie other mlli-owner.- He remnarked: \"Mr. John Owtram 'bas just seen me on a matter eillar te yours.\" \"I'm very sorry te hoar that.\" \"The Bank 'cannot carry both of Silence, \"One of you tiro must meet yeur loans.\"1 Davidi Glenn conîti net repress a sbiver. \"Sir James,\" lie ansirereti un- oveniy, \"do you realîze what thie means te the twin towns? Starvation for theusantis ot mon. and women- operatives anti traders irbo depend on the runnlng e! my mili and John Owt- ram's. Whlchever ot us yen close out, it uteane black misery for the twlan towns. lIm not speaklng for myself alone, but fer ail of us. Carry us for three months longer!\" \"Us ?\" querleti Sir James. \"Myseif anti Owtram.\" \"One et yen must go.\" \"Sureîy it would ba possible te eplit the extendoti credit between us?\" '«I arn afralid that le iiupractlcabla, Mr. Glenn-I wili peet youimy dealsion to-night.\" Hleavy of beart, David Glenn rose te leave. Shortly Ibafore midnight, Sir James Langiey was in the London train, pul- bing down the ýbllnds et bis sleeping berth to ehut ont, If posEible, any !urther thouglit of Brunton and Sbap- Wrorth. In a Pest-'box lay tire letters irritten on the notepaper ef the Bank ani signeti by himsef personally. Hie3 duty by bis shareholders andtisI col- longues mas finlshed. Thle one latter began: \"John Omtram, Esq., \"Doar Si, \"The Bank regrets .... The other letter began- \"Doar Mr. Glenn.\" It mas a long latter, coverlng many pages, but only the last paragraph would heofe general lnterest. l'bis said: \"*Yen may care to leara the reason why the Bank~ miii carry yourselt and net Mr. John Owtram. My declelon had nocesarlly te bo ýbaseti on the broad principies of business. I con- eider that yen are tho more llkeiy te further the avontual -proserlty et the twia teins. I was glati te note that yon made ne reference te the insane rlvalry betireen Brunton anti Shap- werth. The welibelng of the tue le In- toriecked. Try te furthor the broader patr-lotlem. Work for the unltlng et the touas ln sentiment andtin govern- ance. On the prosporlty o! ithe twin touas-net et Brunton alone or of Shapwortb alone--depond.s the pros- Perlty ef the B3ank. Hence my tiecîs- ion.\" A neusboy man aieng the station Dlatform shoutlng a nlght extra ef the local paper. \"'Great Victory!\" hoe yal- lad. \"Ton theusanti killed!\" \"Thero across the seas,\" thought Sir James, \"ara a magnlfied Brunton andi Shapworth.\" How It Worke Out.-\"«Jones proaches home r-tle very eniphatlcflIy.\" \"Yas, and his wifa practices It qulte effectlvely.\"l THE CANADIAN BAN 0F COMMERCE SIR EDMUND WALKER, C.V.O., L.D., D.O.L., Prealdent ALEXANDER LAIRD, Genoral Manager JOHN AIRD, Asa't General Mari CAPITAL $15POOOOOO RESERVE FUND, $l3,500, SAVINC3S BANK ACCOUNTS Interefat at the current rate le ailemed on ail tieposits et $1.00 andi uDwý Caretul attention le given te every account SmaII accounts are melco Âccounte may heoepeneti anti operated by mail. Accotants may ho openeti In the names ef tire or more persons, wlthdra te ho matie by any oe ef thein or by the surviver. -Conservation of 'Funds Nothing dinunishes a man's resourcos se rapid!y as imprudett investmnent. Protection of the principal suin is cvery investor's first dnty. Wc, invite inquiries about the details of our Guaranteeci Trust Investment plan for investing clients' funds in carefully selected first mortgages on, improved real estate. Beoklet miled on request. Capital Paid-up, imiead ere $1 .500,000. $1 .500,000. 18-22 KONG STREET EAST, TORONTO. THE INDEPENDENT ORDER 0Fr FRESTERS FURNISHES A COMPLETE SYSTEM 0F INSURANCE Policiem Issueti by the Society are for the. protection of your family, anti cannot ho bouglit, zoiti, or pletiged. Benefits are payable te the Benelltary luncaue ef deatit. or te the member in case ef .aie total disabillty, or te the member on attainliig seventy years et age. Policies Issued from $500 te $5,000. TOTAL BENEFITS PAID, 49 MILLION DOLLARS. For further Information and Ilterature apply to FRED J. DARCH, S.S. Temple Building E. G. STEVENSON, S.C.R. -TORONTO. \"'Made in Canada\" Wheu You Are on Your HoliIa3 Resting your tired brain and body there nothing as invigorating and altogeth, satisfying as a cool, sparkling bottie COSGRAVES (CHILL.PROOF) PALE ALE It fus the demand for a delicious, freshing, wholesome, appetizing beverage and tonic. Ast bthte asler , : A l We helt8 uer yn.An darwil ship your erder wherever you ' 1",
         "THE COURIER. MONEY AND a Is There a New Canning Trust? AFOGRTNIGHT ýago some comment on -the canned goods situation appeared in -this ýcolumn, under the tIe, \"Gambling in Canned Goods.\" The Wind- ýsor Record, commenting on The Courier's article, says: \"The so-called Scanning trust' has filnally-succeeded ln gobbling every canning factory in Essex Coun'ty, with the exception of the one at Essex, which remains Indeýpendeýnt. The eff ect of the consolidation in operation la that the -producers-the farmners who grow the corn, the\u003e tomatoes, and ýeverything else that is 'canable'-get minimum returns, while the consumer la oharged maximum prices.\" Does the Windsor Record intimate that the Dominion Canners are stili buy- ing up independent factories, or does It niean that there la a new \"combination\" whlch. has bought up Dominion (Canners and is now proceeding to pick up the independents? There has ibeen an intangible rumor for saine time 'in linancial cîrcles that sore sort of reorganization was proceeding. Whether it is to, be a holding coin- pany or a merger ta flot definitely known, but the Inclination ls to a holding company. This would not mean any change in ownerahip of the different caui- neries, and would not require any issue of stocks or bonds. The holding comn- pany would simply take over ail the stocks of ail the ýcanners and equalize the sales, so as to prevent price-cuttUng, wliich rnlght force sorne factories. Into bankruptcy. The idea of a holding co-mpany is a good one, îf those behind It will treat the public fairly. 1,f ilt la used as an instrument to maintain exorbitant prices, then It muet -be condemued. The Wind-Jammer Cornes Back WHILE iSir Rtobert Borden ls dn Engla-nd dlscusslng the question of ships to carry Canada's 191,5 crop to Englanid, and wille -Sir Thomas Shaugh- nessy ls trying to charter vessels to carry both munitions of war and food, one help to, the situation bas corne of Itself. The old wind-jammer has reappeared in aur Atlantdc harbours. Ourcorreapondent et'St. Jehn, N.'B., writes as follows: \"Not for many years bas there been such a showing of ocean-sallingcraft, in this harbour as there la at ipresent. Shlps, barques, schooner of varyin-g size, liue the wharves or ride et enchor int the s.treami; there are a few steamers, but the more -striking-looklng 'wlud-jammers,' wlth their forests of masts and yards, are 'the most couspicuons. Prelghts are a littie easy Just now, deals havlng clropped In pnice In te Brtish market. WWile charteriug has been quiet for ten \u003claya or more, there has been littie reduction In rates; the latest steam. charters haviug been 140s, and in salllng craft 130s. The preseuce of so many ships in the harbour lIn July bas served to stImulate general business, whÉle at the samne time solving te unempVloy'ment problem.\" Conditions in United States A Nere IthNwYokerlofJy hadmirable summary of commercial conditions ln the United States ap- \"The agricultural outlook das une. There will be iess cotton than last year, as Indlicated by the government report -on ecreage and coudltlou-probably 2,500,000 bales less-but the yield wlll ibe ample lu te -clrcurnstances. It wlll ail ha wanted, however, and arrangements belng made ln the South for safe storage and Insurance of te staple, makihng lb good securlty for bank lons, wlll avert Its, belng throwu upon the mnarkets before it la needed for consumption, or at less than Its value. [Prospects for whep.t are birillant, and Europe's contluued demand wll assure te Arnerlcan fermer a remuneratîve price for every bushel that cau be epared. \"Iu the realm of commerce there le coutluued, aithough sornewhat Irregular, improvement tIn domestlc trade, wIlle foreeutýrade la larger lu volume tItan ever before was dreamed of. It Ile one-Blided, of course, for tha time beln-g, wlth reduced Importations, nnd enormously lncreased exporte of breadotuifs and ýpro- visions, plus, the vast shlpments of materials o! war. The balance lu thia country's favour has beeai suffileent to pay off ail our current ludebteduesa abroad, lend more than $200,000,000 to forelgu borrowers, aud, i addition,,lmport. $120,000,000 durlng the preeut year. 'Besidea ail this we have taken back frorn Europe a great volume of our own corporate secuirities formerly held abroad, and are accepting furtiher arnounts every day lu paymeut, for bte coutlnued excess o! our exporte. \"The beat Index to IndustrIal coudiltlous la furnished, by te production o! steel, whlch la now llfty per cent. greatertItan lu January last and steadlly lu- creaslng,. with substential advaucea lni prices.\"1 Mining Boom Overdone? C NIt be possible that te mlnlng boom la overdone? Ia It conceivable that Cte mlnlug stock manipulators are looklng for suckers?ý Are you one -o! titose wito la llkely to be sheared at aity early date? Most of te mines lu Ontarlo are sitowing decreased eanuingis becaluse of te 10w price of silver and for otiter reous, yet lu face of bnd reports, commun Vo ail industrie.i, the brokers are marking up Vteprlce o! stocks to coax the public lu. What lo te teory? As expressed by one broker to the writer, the teory la, \"People must speculate anud rnllg stocks offer thte bes chlance for a gamable. Buy ail you enu while the war lests and then senI lb qitk.\" This is the theory of a gamnbler-even thougit he be dignified witi bte name\u0026ýof~ broker. Motor Cars Reduced NEW prices for automobiles are belztg announeed in 'the United States. N These include: Reo Four, $1,050, and Ueo Six, $1,385; Buldk Six (5 pas- senger), $985; Hudson Six, $1.350; Packard T1win-Six, $2,600, aud $2,950; Haynes Six, $1,385; Mitchell Six, $1,250; Overland Four, $750; Paige Six, $1,095;, Regal Four, $1,085; Studebe'ker Four, $985, Six, $1,485; Hupymobtie, $1,085; Cndillec Eigitt, $1,975; Oidsmtybile Four, $1,095; Oldsmobile Elgitt, $1,295. Canadien prices are also being reduc cd: Mcbaugitlin Six 30-35, $1,085, aud 40-45, $1,385; Hupmobile, $1,385; Chaudler Six (lmported), $1,750; Mitchell Six \u003ct\"nwtp),$1,700; Ford Parts, 10 Per cent, iower; Overlnnd Four (lmported\u003e, $1,060; Studebeker Four, $1,250; Studebaker Six, $1,750; Reo Four (ImPorted), $1,445; Rea Six, $1,895; Russell will have a cheaper car, but price Is not yet announced. BRAIN WORKERS Require The Most Nourlshing Food in an easily digested form. 0'Keefe's Special Extra Mild Aie cornes.under both heads. It has the ricli nutrirnent of the choicest barley malt from which it is brewed. And its food properties are readîly assimilated by the system. Cam Special EXTRA MILD ALE. Tbe Beer That Is A lways O. K. Insist on havîng The O'Keele flrewery Co. Luitd Torotoi. Ail O'Keete boers are ~PECIAL brewed only frorn pure UXIV2«ap barieymalt, choicest hop@ n filtoecd waters 347 W. own and offer a wide range of Caxi- adian CityBonds to Yield 5% to 6%. Pariculors Upon Request qu8TAULUNE leot tteA0 offliCE, te KINl Syr. CASY, TORtONTO NONTNEALLOwN U.. M40.",
         "THE COURIER. ,WAR, BOOKS We have secured through the English Firmn of J. M. DENT '\u0026 SONS a most complete list of books relating to, and bear- ing on the Great War. The tities and descriptive notices speak for themselves.' CHOI CE 0F FOUR 30 cents post paid Prophets, Priers, and Kinga. By A. G. Gardiner Over 10,000 copies uold In Canada. KIgEdward the VIL; George Ber- nadShaw; Rudyard Kipling, G. IL Chesterton; Arthur James Bal- tour. John Singer; Edward Grey; James Keir Hardie; Lord North- cIlle; Dr. Clifford; John Redmond; Floreuce Nightingale; The Pri- maite; David Lloyd George. Under the German Ban In AI. sace and Lorraine. By M. Betham-Edwards iu tbis booke Miss Betihamn-d- wards givas her Impressions gath- ered In the course of ber travelo In the. Provinces o!, Alsace snd Lor- raine. Bbc desoribea very vividiy the. Iongiug of the people to be un- der Prcnebh rule. owing to their de- testation o!. Garmnan tyranuy. The Master'Beggara of Belgium. By L. Cope Cornford An historîcal novai wbicb givea a vivd account o! the Wars o! this Guid of Beggars o! the Low Coun- tries agauat the Spaniards, under the Duite of Alva. duriug the l6tb century. Tbe aboya train Waytarers' Library (new titîca Issued monthly. 72 now ready\u003e. Cioth bound, Illus., 4%,x7. Lord Roberts. By Horace G. Groser Seldom, If ever, in the long and brilliant succession of Britisb commanders bas thera bean one more belovad than Lord Roberts. This littie bock relates thme \u0026tory of Lord Roberts In early daya at Peshawur. the outbreak of the Mutiny, and of bis death in France. Cioth, 634x7%,. 180 pages. THREE LEADERS 185 cents pont paid The Gernan Enigma. By Georges Bourdon Editor Paria Figaro Wbat Gerinans think. What tbey want. What thay can do. Cloth, 7%\u003ex5'4, 360 pages. The Nations at War. By L. Cecli[ Jane The Birbb o! a New Bra. A foracast of the political, snd moral resuits of the Great European War. The War and International Poli- tics. Imn)erial Polities, etc. Its conclusions are optimnistic. Ciotb, 7Ux4%. 230 pages. Britain's Record. 1By F. A. M. Webster Progress of Liberty, Social Pro- grass. Prograss of Commerce, Pro- grass of Science anid Learning, Progress of Justice. Cloth, illus.. 8x5%, 305 pages. Ail mail orders filled immediatoly on receipt of remittance University Book Company - Toronto HERES an unusual carma about Cana- jdian scenery. Part-icularly beautiful are Canadals rivers. The Niagara-to-the-Sea route, taken by the splendid steamers af the Canada Steamshlp Linas, la mainly over rivers-first the lslaud-dottad St. Laiwrence, tben the glorlous Saguenay, wltb its Cliffs and thxe famous Capes \"Trlnity\" and \"Eter- nity.\" Naitber words nor pictures eaul giva any con- ception of tbair majestic beauty. You'll gat some sllght idea of tham by raadlng lNiagara ta the Sea.\" New adîtion of thîs book, beautlfully Illusitratad, just off the press. Sand for It wlth 6 cents lun stamps to caver the cost of mailing. Thos. Henry, Passenger Traffic Manager, CANADA STEAMSHIP LINES, Limited 178 VIctorIa Square, Montreal. The Woman Patrols of EngIand (Concluded from page 13.) people afnd ocgamizatlons of 'the towns very *gexieiovsly co-operate ta pro- vide amnusements, o! tan werka won- der., The movement has met witb very Ilttie unfriecadiine as. Lord Kitchener and the Home Secretary have both given instructions that. military and police off icers shaIl afford lt every Possible backing, aind they have done su with a will. Of course there are difficulti-es to NEW EDMONTON CLUB. T HE opening of the Ladies' ýC House at 'the Highlands, Edin, ton, June 23rd. The figures fr, left to right are: Mrs. G. H. V. BUIY the wife of the Lieutenant-Governor Alberta; 'Mrs. Ayearest, the presidE of -the club; Mrs. Arthur Murp (\"Janey Canuck\"), who made the augurai adidress; Mrs. W. J. Magra chairman of the Building Comniitt, \u003c SOME PROMINENT EDMONTON WOMEN. t A anapahot on the occasion of raising a, flag over the firat privati owned Women's Club In Alberta.* overcome. -One girl greetedl an ap- peal ta ber luyalty witb, \"Get ahuxsg. Tbink 1 dou't know a lady 'tac when 1 sea one.\" But ber suspicions were fInally ai- layad ansd sbe juined -thousanda of other Eugli.sh girls in' bacoinng \"a help rather -than a bndra.uoe.\"' MONA CLEAVER. Savage Hunger.-Mary and Tommy had beau to bear a missionary tal-k at Sunday school. 44DId ha tell you about the poor beathen?\" father euquiired et the din- ner-table. \"Yas, sir,\" answered Mary. H sald that they were o! tan bungry, afld when they beat on their tum-tums It eould be heard for miles.\"l-New York Evening 'Post. A Poser, -e was a member of a ragimeutal baud, and be did flot for- get to brag about It. 'iWby, man, we cau play the most intricate airs at sight,\" ha was sayiug. 'qIndaad!\" said the unbeliavlug lis- taner. \"I sbould 1like to bear you play the airs the drum-major puts on,\"- Tit4Bits. Could F111 the BilI.--4Ha had toldbar the age-,Dld story, and, torn wlth emo- tion, walted for a 'few short words that would decide bis fate. \"George,\" she said, \"bafore 1 give you my answar you muet tell me sometbiug. 'Do you drink anything?\" A enfile o! relia'f llghtad bis baud- some countenance. Was that ail e wanted to know? Proudly, triumphi- antly ha clasped ber lu bis arms and whisparad lu ber shell-like ear. \"Anytblng,\" ie, said.-The Medicine Man. FaithfiuI ta Mis Memnory.-After a parlod of six montba of widowhood, Brldget consantad ta, agalu enter the marriad state. Some waaks after she and Mrs. W. T. Henry, the Mayoi of Edmonton. The flag was presented by Mr. J Macrgor, the superintendent of ,C.PR, and ralsed by Mrs. BulP The club has beau erectad In the terests of the \"ýCIty Beautiful\" m( menit, and overlooks the Saska\u003c wan (River. was lad to thme altar bar old mlstr met bar lu the street drassed lu deapasi mourning. '\"Why, IBrldget,\" she exclaimeid, whom ara you lu black?\" \"For poor Baruey, me first ba mnum. Wban be died 01 was tbat p 0.1 could.u't afford to buy mourni but 0\u003e1 sald If iver 01 could 0i wol and me uew man, Tim, ls as gluer as a lord.\"-Argonaut. The lrony of It.-\"Are you a-miL aire, father \"No, my boy. 1 wlsh I was.\" \"How mucb mouey do you 1 father?\" '90h, wall-sometlmas I make .mucb as a bun-drad .pounds Iu mouth.\" 'IA bundred poundm a n-Louth! (slowly, after a pause) \"and ýha gi' me tuppenca a weak! \"-Puneh. A Gloomy Outiock-Small Job! was wriggbLng and twis.ting lu a v endeavor to put bis artas througb sleeves of au undargarmeut anud ti «get lt over ibis haad. After seve futile attempts be caIled out to mother: \"Say, maauma, wban 1 get to be angal, and bava whigs, 1 dou't see b l'Il aver gat my shirt on!I\"-New Yý Times. OR t* Case of Necesty.-Madge-,MY vourite auitbors are Browninig E Henry James. I îead tbem over i over again. Marjorie-You bave- to.-4Llfe. 1h 8 University Ave.",
         "THE COUTRIER. e Real Destroyers of £merican Neutrality (New York Heraid.) lE a.ttack made by Gerrnany and heoe agents anid supporters upon tb\u003ee policy this government lias wed In miainning neutrality lias ]nerely a fog to cover up the ac'tivities of Kalserism. Muenter, Hoit, was one thread In a vaet Ic. Few Americans caui agree Professer Hugo Munsteilberg, lter's associate at Harvard, that lead dynamiter was acting alone on his own responsibiity. Ile letter to bis wife Muenter B of a ship te leave this port on Lday, whicb woculd be lest on the 'Or îve days later. Hie thouglit ýe the Philadelp2hia, or the \"Sax- This lndicates the work of as- tas. ýMuenter knew a ship liad Inarked for attack; that was ail. iatter of'fact, the steamsbiP the Minnehaba, which cieared on iday but did not steam until %Y The Minnehaba tock fire on 'th, thi the attaok by fire on this shiP. ig no passenzers and devoted te transporting Mnunitions, States han ne oon.cern ex ountry was lLsed as the deed. But tjïe Mueniter agiare of lght on what Oing on here ini dedfaiace of f thiis country. 111 -be diffidult for the U to continue frtendiy relt lermally lu vlew of the iacreasiing liet of v;iolation Litrailty. The operatious of 18 station at Saiyville, w t.he seizure of that plant by mient and lis being piacec ads of the United Statesn latest disclosure. The ac thee consplratoirs will bring about a breaX~ lati what tUey are seekI:uý Children in My Stree (1915-19m5) By Hardress O'Grady. ramp resounds the livelong I day long their sbrill, sv a, 'Right about,\" \"Charge,\" \" ~ray,,» Sker's patient ears surprise stormIng some rose-hedge Lbt, 'Weet-pea trench, some lly Zitial valour of their shout la the enemy bas fled. and fro, and to and fro banners ling, swords athed 'lic death, In gardens go EItlest souls that ever breatl the star-glow of their eyes ýhines the liglit of sum the lond, stern, martial w idish, trnstful note la heard. Corne twenty years-shall you and I Hear these same babes that sbrilly cry Cal, grown to manhood, call once mnore The awful cails of reai war? And shall those tiny, -tender limbs, Grown to great strength for better deeds, Lie scattered for the wicked whims 0f some foui beast that on War feeds? Those littie hands that gentiy cling Be maimed asid shrunken by some sheil? Those voices that so shrilly sing Be siienced by the cannon's yell? Those eyes so bright, where love sliines now, Wberein we read the dreams of fame, Be blinded and the puckered brow Strive to conceai the sockct's shame? Or what we can, to dam the flood Oif present war, let war befali Once more the cildren of our blood? Let none forget--ýour politics Are but an ape's disjointed trickis, If ever more the war-newa greet The grown-up, eildren from my street. -London Chronicle. V11e In Defence of Conscience ,ePt Tas l@ meanest thing ever said about ease c onscience -Were the words put bas Into Hamiet's mouth by Wililam the Shakespeare: \"Thus conscience does- inake cowards of us ail.\"1 ited This remark bas caused many people fous to believe that conscience wvas nothlng con- but a coward.maker, and consequently Sof tbey have refused to have any'tbing to the do with It. Neyer was anytbing more hi-eh unjust. Shakespeare's assertion la -the truc only on the assertion that we are i n ail sînners. To be fair, lie sbouid bave avy, sald: \"lThus conscience does mare tivi- cowards of ail of us who have slnined as- or who are about to sin.\" Thon lie Pe- wouîd have been more in, agreement St'O wlth Solomon, wbo was wiser, and who said: \"The wicked fiee when no mati pursueth, but the rigliteous are as ~t boid as a lon.\"ý-LIfe. A Long War Ahead day 1-Ituidyard Kiling. ceet Up te the present, as far as we cati fInd out, Germany bas suffered soine Fflp- tbree million casuaities. She cati sui- fer another tbree million, and, for aught wo ýknow, another tbree million after that. ýWe have no reason to be- re- lievo that site wili break up suddeniy and dramaticaily, as a few people stiii beexpeot. Wby should ste? She tooi\u003c two 'genierations te prepare lierself lIn every d-etail and tlirouýgh every fibre of ber national belng for ibis war. unl- She is iplaying for tbe bigliest st\u0026lces In the world-tbe dominion of the world. It seems to me that hhe must ied. either wln or bieed ýto deatb almost where ber Ulnes rlin to-day. There- fore, we and our allies must continue mier to pans our cbildren tbrougit lire to Srolovit until Moloc~h perlali. This, as ord I van see, la wbere we stand, and * where (Jermany stands. PATRIOTISM AND FLAGS go hand in hand. The display of our flag is a patrioti.' expression. Do Canadians display their flag enough? THE CANA- DIAN COURIER thinks not. There can be too mucli flâg waving, but tiiere ean also be too littie. We believo that Canadians have been guilty to a fault of displayinge. too littie the flag we ail love s0 well. A'FLAG FOR EVERY HOME.' Believing this, THE CANADIAN COURIER lias arrang-- ed to supply to its readers suitable home flags at the inoderate prices quoted below. These fiags are Made-ýu-Canada, and their wearing quali- ties are guaranteed by THE CANADIAN COURIER. They are cheap enough for the most modest purse and good enough for the wealthiest home. This Union Jack 32x48 inches, complote with pole (6 fe.t long), hli yard, ianti wlndew vooket, at $1.45, post paiti, ls a real bargaîn. It sa designed to fly from'an upetaàirs' wlndow. MAIL ORDERS PROMPTLY FILLED. AHl orders promptly filled by return mail. Send to-day, using coupon. No letter llecessary if coupon is earefully lilled out. The. Canadian Courier,c uPO Toronto, Canada. CO P N Send me a fiag. I have lndlcated wlth un X the one I want, and amn remitting herewlth the ampunt quoted above for thls fiag Name ................................. ....... SIZES AND Address.. ................ 1............. PRICES: Union Jack, 32x48 inches ................ 51 cents, Mail Po8t Paiti (Canadian Enslgn, samo size, 5 cents extra.) Union Jack, 32x48 incii. (sam. fiag as abeve), complet, wlth pole (6 foot long), haiyard and window socket, $1.45, Mail Post Paid \u003cCanadlan Ensign, tame aize, fi cents extra.) Union Jack, 24x36 inches ................ 25 cents, Mail Post Pald Union Jack, 20x28 inches ................ 20 cents, Mail Post Palti Set of Allies' Piags, 6 In numbor, 15x20 Inches, 60 cents, Mail Post Paiti TOMMY, THE COLONEL AND THE DOG. il' nel to Tommy, In trouble for bayonetting a dog, \"Why dldn't you kt hlm wlth the. butt endi of your rifle?\" imnye \"Why didn't h. bite me,,wiv his tail 7\" -TiAbits.",
         "TIIK COURIER. OHAPTER VI. Arrangements. ~, uSYoung wernan Is the ýonly one,\" -said Simpson, j asý be entered the office; \"I've. been telliug her she'li have ta work hard, and mayhap you'1i lcrease ber pay bofore long.\" \",She wili certainly have te wor\u003c bard,\" said Ronald with a eamilo. II won\"t deltain Yeu now, Simpson; I Muet ose if 'Miss Williams je suitable.\" '\"Factory work ain't eultable ta ber, air,\" SImpson replied, as ho dleparted, \"she loolce fit ta drap sometimies wben the -day la over.\"1 \"And yon neyer told me the work was se trylng,\" eaid Ronald reproach- fuliy wbon the 'door hail closed upon the fereman. \"The -standing wu.e a littie trylng during the heat, but It 'was the sarne for me as for everyono else. Wbat wonld. -have been the use of complain- iug? Would you have providod arrn- chairs for ail of us?\" \"Iarn afraid I shouid net.\" There was an expression af delilht t I eyez as ho Spoke; he was re- jolced that ho couid uow seeure ber Society' every day. \"And surely the condlitions of yonr factory are very superior ta those 'of a large number of mille; tibere ie plen.ty of air, and every reasonable cornfort.\" 'II beileve aur miii ta ho very super- ler ta a great umany others. Ail the sarne lt lsn't fit for Yeu. HQ'w glad 1 amn that You are cornIng bore. Gulle- lese $lm-pon-!\" \"Yeu wlll remember, air,\"'abe said dernurely, '1that the appaittrent le altogether Si'mpsou's.\"I 'II will rernember .1t. Are You goiug te call me'Sr\" 'II certainly arn dnriug business lAnd out of themn?\" 'Il uhal net see you.\" \"'I suppose you wlll have toa miucbh 0f rny eocioty in tbom.\" \"Ve'ry likely, sir,\" she repiied mocc- ingly. \"'Now as ta business. Have yon rnastered the machine?\" 'II have. 'It l, ye'ry easy ta Jearu. I canuot write fast as yot, but 1 shall devate as rnudh trne s possible ta practislIng eut of office houre.\" 'Yo.u wll do notbing of the 'klnd. Yeu will 'wrIte quite faet 'enough for me. Besides, Yeu ean't practlse out of bours, fur the machine wll bo bore. Now as ta pay.\" \"I amn not wcrth mucb at present.\" \"You will recelve markcet price, nelther more nor leas. Yen -will bc gin witb twa pounds. a week, and I make you a present of lte machine. Tt we quarrel at the snd of a week it will ho yours te take a^way.\" \"I accept your h-audsome present with gratitude. 1 wil pick a quarrel wlth you, and ýthon offer my services, end rny machine, ta somoone elee.\" \"Yen hac) better not.\" 'iSeriously, Mr. Westiaice, ydlu muet not give me sa rnuch et first. i amn not worth it. It Ie the prIse of a skilled, typist, whbile I arn only a learner.\" \"Arn 1 the master of the miii or are you?\" \"You are very 'rncb rnaster.\" \"As 'I unfortunately had occaqlnn totellu another youn.g lady who was etaylng in our bouse. She weitt away this mrnung ln cousequenco.\" \"Do you mean that handsorne girl who weut ove' the !actory 'with that yonne ofrficerr\" \"Yee. T ar n xdeed sorry 'that you were- subiect ta any anueyafloe, and so wae Mr, Haseifoot. You will sure- ly ho glad te avold otrangore.\" 'II am~ dlghted ta avoid them.\" \"Van wlll 'work lu the Inner room at transecribiug niy lettere -and pepers. gernetimes 1 e-haîl corne lu and dic- tê,te themn te yen, cptherwiee yen wili be entireiy ajndisturbed. Vous' honre wil1 be frein ton ta one, and 'Tram two By MRS. HARCOURT-ROE Autlesr of **A Man of Mystery,\" \"The Silent R0om.\", Etc. M ARY WILLIAMS comas tothIe paper manufacturer, to ask for work. He hesitaites to empioy her, because she looks toc genteel for mili work. There ls a special mysterious reason for lier want- Ing employmnent for herself, and aiso for lier lover. Weetlake really fails Ini love with lier. Mary Wil- iams starts a long Journey on foot back across Dartmoor - to, Plymouth. Riding out, Westlake meets her and tries to Induce her flot to sleep on the moor. Mary Willianms goes on her way. Along the road she leaves a parcel wlth a cottager whieh she pays hlm te keep tlll It la called for by a mnan; afterwards a bicycle which she buys on the road. At PrIneetown she visited the gaol-and watched the convIcts on the plantation-, af- terwards returned to, Willowbridge, and the paper mnill. Her duties at the mill are mucli enlivened by the peculiar attentlons of lier employer who liecomes very unpopuiar with. is flancee, Miss Ornmonde, in con- sequence. Me offers Mary a posi- \u003etion as itypist. Two people flnd themselves eýach between two f1re.. to five. I hope six hours wll not be too much, but Yeu n'eedn't wor\u003c ail tihat time, you know.\" M1 certainly shall, If there is any WOýrer to do.\" He smlled; he was resoived that seule of the time, at ail events, should be spent in .tal.kîng -to hlm -What a detes-mined Young lady Yeu are!.\" \"II iarn obllgod ta ibe with so 'dote-r- mined a man. Th'e hours are by 'no mleane long, and (I repeat 1 arn not worth so rnudh Mrley yet.\"1 'IBut Yeu are. I shahl gîve yo'u rny catoidential Jettera to write, and trust Yeu as I should'trust no other person on the promises. You will have It In your power to betray my tra-de secrets teoather employers, and Injure rny business vaetiy.y %CBUT why do You trust me? As J B ald before, what possible grounds have Yeu for doing so?\" \"Are our sens given us for noth- mng? You are true as steel. You 'couic) as soon betray a trust as a statue turn finte a living being.\"I 'II think,\" éhe said eoftlY, \"rny one virtue le that 1 amn stralghtforward- as far as circurnatances will allow me~ to be. Oh, Mr. Westilke, suppose one day you turn round on me and -re- proaoh me for havlnig kept you ln the dark. 'But It is ,not my wlah ta do so.\"t 'ýI wll nover reproacih you.\" 'She 'loked at the clock. 'ýDo you J\u003cnow what tirne It le, Mr. 'Westlake' « I muet be off at once or 1I shall be la'te for the factory.\" . \"Yen are not golng back ta the fac- to~ry, 1 wiJJ speak ta Simpeon. Take a holiday this afternoon, and corne ta- rnorroaw morning at tien. 'Oh, I forgot ta tell you; ISaturday le a half day, and whenever yeu w'ant a holiday you have on'iy to asic for lt.\" \"Thaxik you, sir,\" she replied wlth merry eyee, and the mocklng air which always made him feelhe was ber humble slave insetead of her mas- ter. and that she lcnew it weli. \"~But you 'muet ask deferentiaily, you icnow.\" \"Ce'rtuinly, sir; 1 will go On Mny knees te yen, sir, if you deSire It.*' \"'That le a very safe 'If,' and you know It.\" \"I do know It, sir, and 1 have the honour ta 'wlah you good rnornlng.\" lier radiant air died away as soon as she had left tihe mli prémises. It wa- aýs If a heavy welght bad been lifted from her shouldere 'to quit the uncof- gal toil and Society of the miii, and every day eue appreciated Ronêald'sq kIcndness -more, let it procoed from hies regard for ber or not. Sihe knew that hG wonid treat ber with evory defer- once, and neyer presume on their re- spective positions by word or deed, stili the load of care whloh 8he always carripid couid nover bo wholly re- rnoved. Rixe migbt forget It for a of Enid short time, but the bitter, black facta, remained, and oould net be set on ane aide, or 'more titan momentarily for- gotton. Her life, as site 'regarded it, Must continue ta be one of trouble and anxiety. \"I'm afraid yonr diuner's cold,\" said ,Mrs. Mason, w'io met lier at tite gate of thte farm. house. 'II titougitt yeu were in as usuai, and put it on the table.\" IlIt docsn't matter at ail,\" roplied Mary. But sho was tiTed after ber morning's work, and te coarse table- ciotit, the black-handled blunt kaife, the worse fork, the common crockery ware, ail filied her 'wlit disgust, which 'was net i*esse-nod at the0 'siglht of the dish o! half-coid meat and potatoes rnixed, wlth fat fioatiug ou the top o! the gravy. Sibe pu'sbed it away and ato sel biscuits aud ripe currants, thon toak: bersell severeiy to task as she Sud- de.niy 'remembered the convicts she' had' seen engaged at Prlncetown ln bard toil. \"You are net a bit botter thon. some o! them,\" she said ta hierseif. \"What you want la ta ble treated ta some 'real hardahipe as tbey are, and per- hapa alter yen had eaten prison fare of suet puddlng and gruel, wlth et fimes ouly bread and 'water when yen comrnitted -tho s-mallest offence, you wouid not grumble at good meat whicb la cold Vhrengh yeur owu fauit. And if you 'were sbut up fer a week lu soitary cosefinoment, 'wlth on'iy a plank bed ta Sleop on, It wouid, no doubt, be the test tblng for you, and wonld teach you 'ta vaine snob blese- luge as are left to you.\" ,Sie langbed, and 'faily went up- stairs, and indniged lu a good cry. Simpson was quite, rlght when ho had said factary 'work wae unsuitablo ta ber, lu spite of ber fine contittution It hec) already affeoted ber nervous, syetem. Happlly that ltIme was over. Ronald rWestlal e returued borne jey- fui. Ho was lu the blghest Spirite, and both h e and Raslfoot raared witb iaughter at eue anotber's anecdotes. \"You are -two beartless folle*s!\" eald Mr. Westlake. \"Yau onght bath ta have been Iu tsars over ýLouIse's departure. You miade a groat m-ls- take, Haselfeot, lu nat Inung ber ta etay. .Are yon aware she bas-thon- sanda of panda ln ber own rlgbt, au nîterfering mother and no fatber?\", \"But what bas that ta do with me ?\" 'I tbanght perbaps It might have sone'thiug ta do w1tb yen. Neyer beard of sncb a thing âu yo*ur Ille be- fore, did yon; no naval man ever bas.\" \"I wIli not profess ta misunder- stand you,\" sald Hasolfoot. wvlth a ernile, fer no one ever took 'Mr. West- Iake'a jokes in bac) part evon if tbey oblected 'ta tihern, as they were given. wlth snob evidont goo\u003ed-beartedîneas; \"but as far as I arn concerned 1 like 'ta ho captain lu my owu sbîp, aud I lntend ta ho.\"1 iAND yon think Miss Ormeudeý fiwonld talce comrnand? Weil, 1 dareeay sho wonld. Ronald .eeenis te be o! yonr opinlin.\" ' Ronald made no repi'y; ho did nlot thiuk lt necessary ta pubîli bis dis- agreemuent wIt'h Louise, even lf sh e bac) meutionoc) the fact berseif, R1e folIaw'ed hie mather wbeu she left the table instead o! going back to tihe of1fice. \"Simpson bas been tehlug me,\" ho said, \"that my hanciwritlng is tho do- -pair 'of the 'miii, it le 'so vile, sud that 1 anglit ta enlgage a typist. I bave accordlugly ýdoue so.\" \"Dear nme! tbat's quite a new- faugied nation,\" returned bis father; \"in MY tirne people conid write plain- iy witihout ai these 'modernu inven- tions. 'StIll 1 muet say It rnay ho au Impravexueut wben anyone 'wrItes like you do.\" 'Ille 'writes a beautifu ha-ud,\" said Mrs. Westiake, \"nat a bit Lll\u003ce aýbusi- ness clerk wouid. It le a thoi'çngh gentlemrn'u' baud.\" \"I grant yen It le excellent ta loo\u003ek The _Sacrifice For Home and Country Thousands of people who have beeth accustomed to buy onlY American periodicals are flOW ,giving preference to British and Canadian periodicals. They find a comfort there - a message there-which cannot be got fromr the writings of foreigin authors, however clever they may be. ,Subscribers to The' Canadian Courier are more ge .nerous in their prai1se these dayi than theY have ever been. Thé burdeni of thedir letters is, \"You are giviflg us the real atuff-tlling us just what we want to know.\"? Since the war opened, The Canadian Courier ha. spent money freely to get the best photogr-aphs fromn the front. These are secured through the photograph agencies in London, England, who have their camera men on-every front. The Cana- dian Courier ha. a choice of the Daily Mail photographs, whlch has the best service in the word; Only genuine photo- graphe are used. The Canadian Courier doce flot \"lsteal\" ite pic- turcs f rom other publications, but buys original. Permanent R e p r e- sentatives -Wanted. There la always a dcmand inl The Courier subscription depart- ment for men and women who want toi earn sonne money in thelr'spare time. This io an op- portunlty to, work up a permani- ent side-line which wIll brlng the agent 'a splendid yearly ifi- corne. It la a chance to build up a permanent business of your own. -The Courier safeguards its agents' rights. If someane offered you an an- nuity of $100 a yc'ar for life, you would think lt a grand wind- fait, wouldn't you? You can carri an aninuity of this size very slm- ply and easlly by taking charge of a district for-The Courier and looklng aftcr Its subscribers Iin that district Most of those sub- scriptions cani be rcnewed fromn year to year bytelephone. Thus there is a yearly profit to the agent, with littie effort. Write us About it at once. The Canadian Courier circu- lates in every anc of the ninif provinces, and it neede agents ini every town and city in Canadla. Write us for information as to how you cari aarn from one to thrcc hundrcd dollars a year wlthout any great effort. There Waa neyer a more fa- vourable time ta get subscrip- tions for the only illustrated wcekly published in this coun- try which is welcorrned in every home from the Atlantic to the Pacific. Address the Circulation Manager CANADIAN COURIER Toronto.",
         "THE COUIER. Mr. Westlake, retorted, \"but it the sliglht drawback of beiag at t Siglit quite unintelligible. 1 defy I to tell which are o's or a's or Or again which are m's Or u's or There is reone slight possibility flakiag out the i's, because they are ted'-usually at long and irregu- distances-but if it were neot for tand, an ýoccasional easy capital er, or perhaps an s, you could neyer wliathle was writing about.\" 1 eauld,\" sald Mrs. Westiake; \"his ers -When lie was away were rny BteSt treasure.\" ['ni afrai they didn\"ýt corne very 11, mother deýar,\" Isa-id Ronald. \"My 1er is quite ýriglt, my writin;g is lit cornes, I supose, of being edu- da-t a p\u003eublie sehool where noth- so common as handwriting (which OtS -thle comfort and convenience àunldreis of people you corne in La.et wl-tu), was of any coase- rice. Wel, anyhow, 1 liave en- 2d a typist; she is coming to-mor- ýliO is site?\" ~Miss Williams; a lady. Now my ioffice isn't furnised. That is ay there m-ay be a barýe table 'and r In It, but tbey won't do. Ca-n a-pare me a littie furaiture from bouse,, or s!hall I buy it lin Ply- \u003eOf1'% Ibuy unythiag,\" bis father re- '. \"We have more liere than we Wwhat to do with. Ha-ven't we, es5. Go round tie haluse, my dear a-nd ta-ke whatever you want.\" ~'hiat Is just what my mother said. Ie' when 1 was furaishing my cab- sa-id 'Haselfoot, \"and I astonished bY ta-klag ýsome -of lier best things. site dýid net grudge them to me.\" Lný have often urged Ronald to e bis office more comfor.table, but 7ron't,\" said Mr. Westlake. fow can I have carpeta- and luxur- wlhen ýmill ha-nds are In and out. Iierliaps If you make the Iuner of- comllortable I m1ght go anad sit B-so!metmes when 1 arn tired, If tYpIst wiil let Mpe. 1 arn awfully Id of 'lier; 1 arn reýally.\" Ou a-fraid of anyone?\" excla-ired tiother. \"Oh, don't have -ber then.\" lier own mmnd site conjured up a il -of a estern-fea-tured, Igrim, spec- Id feinale, wb'o would, ma-te -tbtngs Liaplea-sant for lier da-rling boy. a llght da-waed on Haselfoot, and historian regrets to say that bie a quiet wiak behind everyoae's ttiust bave bler because I have en- d -lier,\" sa-Id Ronald. 'Il must try Slavre 'well, andl then perhaps site be kîni to me. J wilI citoose te [5 t-lis evening, and takle them In.\", le servants wIll, of course, take for you.\"P Would rather doD It myself.\" et me help you,\" sa-id Ha-selfoot. i a firsit-rate liaud a-t furnIsiig. I chosen no end -o! things before for ca-bins.\" 'TUa moment's liesita-tion Ron- a-Id a-ccepted thte offer. Witen work was over thte young men tite round o! the bouse. is WillIams,\" reped Rnaldetel y.y il awfully gla-d o! 1t. It made me ^able to see thit exceptional girl .Lgthe bands, and I felt lte a fool 'se I dldn't know wbetber 1 ouglit cog'nlze lier or not. I would have It inun oment only I was a-Ira-id she mlglit nlot ilîke IL. You'll La- -s -me, won't you?\" lat 1 anunot do. Site la mSat par- Li', and declines even -my soclety )t purelýy ase a matter of business. sa-l-l get my mother te ca-Il on àzid perliaps Bite may be lnduced 31t a-t Our loue. Tben you nay Ilon't know that I had better. Titat »Ou14 bowl -any ma-n over In no a-nd I bave llttle besldes my pa-y,\" jhe lieutenant laugblug. le las certaly bowled, me over,\" 'lt lRonald. e muet set to work,\" sa-id bie \"Tehere tsn't toýo mudb trne.\" mooni lad -been ýcleaned by hls inl the afternoon. Thte young ýeIected a square of te ricbest carpet from the study, two easy chairs fron the drawing-roomn, two chairs for work, a table and va-nous other titings, earrying thern la at d-usk with great satisfaction. The lieutenant was la- vaýluable; hie vied with Ronald la thiat- ing o-f Mary's cornforts. 'ýShe must have a bookcase, with new books in it,\" lie said. \"My dear fellow, that Is a flrst-rate suggestion. She certainly shaîl. I 'ai select the books mysel! when we have finished.\" \"And handsorne curtains.\" \"Yes. And pictures.\" And j'he rurthlessly denuded some o! the rooms o! a few ohoice gents. - Ha-vlag started witit the firm belief that Ronald was desperately ini love with the pretty typist, ýaad would pro- ba-bly rnarry bier lu tIre (for a-ny dis- honourabletitouglit lu connection witli lier had neyer entered -hi% mmnd), Has- elfoot saw nýothiag ia-cougrutous la the proceeding, a-nd ea-tered iato themt wi'ti -the heartiest good-will. T HE work table for the machtine was of course bare, except for business stationery. \"The only 'lt la the elega-uce of the furniture,' said the naval officer a-t Ieagth, as lie surveyed their woTk wlth pride. \"Except that lt la the entire reasoti for tlie preseace o-f everythlng else,\" refflied Ronald, laughing. \"D-on't you think you maiglIt put a few sweet bisceuits and chocolats, a-ad so on, ln tins la that cabinet? Girls like s-weet thiags,\" sa-id -Haselfoolit a-t fihe conclusion o! tite proceedings. \"I will. S.he miglit not always bie borne la good time if there is mu-ch work te do. Preserved fruits a-ad thiags like tha-t always corne lu.\" \"And,\" lie thouglit, \"if ber-meals are saa-ty or badly cooked, as I very mouct -fear they may a-t titat fa-rm, site ca-n supplement, tem iere.\" Another brilliant, Idea came Înto bis mind, but -le, kept silence about, tbls. Lt was eleven o'clock before the young men weut away, bot very mucli pleased w1t-h -the resu-lt o! titeir work. \"Il den'-t grudge you anything, my dear boy,\" sa-id lis niother the next moraiag, \"aa ýye very well kaow, but doiit you thiat that caripet is a little too good for an office. It was very ex- pensive.\" \"INever mind, motiter. I will *buy you another for the study out of my bard ea-rnlngs.\" \"'You wlll do aothing of thte kinil,\" sa-id bis fa-ther; \"office furnîture Is suppied by the ftrm; it Is a neces- sary.\" Mr. Ha-selfoot thouglit titat thte sen- ior partuer of thte flrm wouid open is eyes ifie saw what was Iuceluded un- der thte liead o! 'laecessarles,\" but lie was not a-t ail llkely te, see IL. He neyer entered thes office. \"Lt wae. a-Il my fa-ult, Mrs. West- lake,\" saId tbe lieutenant. 11 recoin- mended. thes ca-rpe't, and put hlmt up to a-Il sorts of extravagances. He must propîtiate the typlst, you know, go I adývlsed. hdm, wlien lie was about It, te do -the tthing ba-ndsomely.\" \"Yes,\" returned Ronald, \"Iyou are re- sponsible -for a gond Geai. And wben 1 bave to dictate a letter I siaîl enter la fear a-nd. trewnbllng.\"1 \"I a-m eorry site Is se disagresable,\" sa-id Mrs. Weetlake. \"Do havé Borne- one else.\"1 As soon as, tity 'were a-loue ha iu- formel lier that Miss W.lllams was only formidable, flot d-Isaigreeable, anld be sbouîd be ntuch oblIged If a-be would. caIl vu lier. 'iS'he le qtdte a lady,\" h. sa-id, \"a-nd living a-s site dees a-lotie, ln an uneotU- fortable ta-rmi hou-e, abs miglit be glad -te seA you. And,\" lie added, 'a-ith somle besltation, \"don't you -tin YoJl igbt beg 'ber, a-e a fa-vour, te lncb with us of a day. You kuow 1 niay wa-ut -ber a-t a-ny time, a-nd It la a long wa-y for her to go home.\" \"fO! course 1 wlll,\" repied good Mrs. Westlake. \"And I darssay s doesfl't get very good meaIs, poor thingi She ,will ma-ko our lunci hier d.lnner, 'ne do\u0026ubt.\" \"If you put it on a-ny otiter groumd titan ia favour te us-w'btcbe lt isehe won't -corne.\" 'I wIll t-aks cars of tsa-t.\" It ýwas witli aoms anxiety titat Ron- (When \" Palmolive\"' Was Young 3,000 years ago the women of ancient Egypt, skilled ini toilet arts, learned the wonderful cleansing qualities. of Palm and Olive oils. While their \"Palmolive \" was necessarily a crude combin- ation of these ojis in their rnatura1 state, modern women, inheritors of this invaluable discovery, enjoy their combination in PALMOLIVE SOAP, made of the famous Palm and Olive ojis. Thus the fa-me of the first Palmolive lias survived th)e centuries, handed down from generafion to generation-, -From the fimie when Cleo patra ruled to the presenit day opularity of the \"~PALMOLIVE Doctrine of Soap Next In popularity cornes PALMOLIVE SHAMPOO, the liquid Paîniolive prepared to make the proper ca-re of the hair easy. Ask, aiso, for PALMOLIVE CIIEAM, a delîghtful cold cream which softens and invigorates the skin. To make the acquaintance of ail three accept our THREEFOLD SAMPLE OFFER-A miniature cake of PALM- OLIVE SOAP, boutie of SHAMPOO and tube of CREAM, attrachively packed, mailed on receipt of five 2-cent stamps. Address B. J. JOHNSON SOAP CO., Lirnited 155-157 George Street. Toronto, Ont. A.eziean Address: B. J. Johnson Soap Co., in'1. Milwaukee, Wis. Choice nuts and delicately flavored chocolates in a variety of combinations....... Another revelation of the high standard of qanQ~ @ ho/dat4",
         "THE COURIER. SHOPPER'S GUIDE PRINTING. PRICE TICKETS that seli the goodà. Ail prices in stock. Fifty cents per hundred. Samples for stamp. Frank H. Barnard, 35 Dundas St., Toronto. STAMPS AND COINS. PACKAGE free to collectors for 2 cents postage; also offer hundred, different forelgn stamps; catalogue; hinges; five cents. We ibuy stamps. Marks Stamap Co.,* Toronto. A SSImILATIVE ME2MORY, OR HOW TO ATTEND AND NEVER FOR- GET. Prof. A. Lolsette tells how you may strengthen the power of your memn- ory. A perfect memory means lncreased capablîlties and a larger Income, l2mo.. c loth, $3.00, post-paid. University Book Cg., Desk A., 8 University Ave., Toronto. HOTrEL DIRECTORY THE NEW FREEMAN'S HOTEL. (European Plan) One Hundreti and Fifty Rooms. Single roins, without bath, $1.60 and $2.00 per day; rooms with bath, $2.00 per day and upwards. St. James and Notre Dame Sts., Montreal. KING EOWARD HOTEL. Toronto, Canada. -ireproof- Accommodation for 750 guests. $1.50 Up. American end European Plans. MOSSOP MOTEL. (Llmited) TORONTO, ONTARIO. European Plan. Absolutely Fireproof. Roomas with or wlthout bath fromn $1.50: 8T. MAR%àGMARET as\"S COLLEGE TORONTO A RESIDENTIAL AND DAY SOHOOL FOR OIRL8 (Founded by the iste George Dlckson M.A., Former Principal of Upper Canada College, anci Mrs. Dickson.) ACADEMIC COURSE, from Preparatory to University Matriculation and Fjrst Vear Work. MUSIC, ART, DOM ESTIC SCIENCE, PHY'SICAIH, XDUCATION- Cricket, Tennis, Basket Bal, Hockey, Swiniming Bath. Sahool Reopens September 14, 1915 Wito for Prospectus. VU. REDUE CKSU, Promeut. lau J. E. MacDONALD. D.A. Pujufiolpa ST. ANDREW'S A Residmitis sud Doy Soboul for Boy. Upper sud Lower Sechools. Boys prepared for Mâtrlculatoa, imo the. Univer- COLLEGaitis, for entranco faile the. Royal Militry Çollege, snd for Business. Calendar oontsininst TORONTO se ONT. priuasmn napiain Autumin Term Commences Sept. l3th, 1915. Re.A.LD. rceO.dIDBut. WES TBOURNE Church Residentioll a SchIoPIJI forGil Dey Sobool for Girls. Niew buildings-Beautiful27 BloSratWt lieaithy situation,with 7acresT R N O, A A A ,fpleying fields.TO N OC AD 'Primazy Denartment to Matrieu- letion course. Roshold Science, A residential and day school- Music, Painting, smail enough to onsure for thie P,..utTh miel . Tfl Nsd\" oMf T.n.t. pupils a. rosi home, careful per- sonal training and thoughtful ,«m.. mý-1 iimée..s f st, \"- supervision. Pupils prepared for Ls*s. Ulis.. the. University. Clans instruction FOU CALSIJiA APPLY :1\u003e TII BUBA ia Folk andi Aesthetic Dancing ms well as Physical Work. Outdoor Sports. Aff.3iated with the To- ronto Conservatory of Music. O? F. McGlllivary Knowies, B.C.A., Art Director. UUMW 01158.School roopens Septomber l4th. Tue . et Laêrd IUe si rete For Calendar address the Prin- À Re7sdndmia Scho@1 for 0fr'.. cîpal, Miss M\u003c. Curlotte. B.A. Nature Makes The Flavour oî, The cool, tempered breezes of the hill-top gardens ini Ceylon, produce a tea of delicate, yet rich and flavoury quality. A careful selection of the finest growths is blended to mnake fSALADAY§t B 78 aid awaited the coming of his typlet ,the next morning. Perhaps she wouid be angry at wliat lie lad dogne, but sureiy 'le had a riglit to furnieli his own roims as lie pleasod. He us.hered lier in as If she lad been a princess. \"This an office!\" site exclaimed lu amaze. \"It isn't like the outer office,\" lie re- plled deprocatingly. But ýshe understood. \"How kind! How good of you!\" alie said warmly. I'And bookis, too! I have *ionged for books cf late. You 'wili, no doubt, lot me take these home one by one. 1 will be very careful of them, for I love books. R 'wouid aimost as'soFon ili1-treat a chuld as a book.\" \"1T*hey are yours te do as you please with. When you are tlred of them, or have left, theum at home, I wIll replace them wiVh others. Tell me wliat books you 'like and yo~u shall have them. CI men 'the office shail have them,\" as lie foresaw a repreof from bier. III cannot 'take any moTe presents fromn Yeu. I ha-ve already accepted the very h'andsome present of the type- writer.\" Ho had sent for this; it was on the table. \"Piease tell me what rny work Is,\" she continued igravely. 'DEon't make, me feelý l.ke a culprlt,\" lie pleaded. 'Il havoa't done anythlng wrong, have 1?\" ,He 'wondered as hoe spoke w.hy she was the only womlan ho had over met who bad the power to make hlm un- certain as to the wisdom of hie acte. Ho did not know tînt It was the hesi- tancy of love. «\"You have been most kind--as yon alw'ays are. Now, piease set me to work.\"1 'Ho dictated a letter, but lie was as- toulsed whea lie read lit over, and 'tore It Up1. 41tin afraid I haven't expressedl my meaning clearly,\" lie sald. III have had other bhings to think cyf.\" 'lie prod-uceli some parlers for hier to copy, andi, golng tato la o'wa office, shut the door of communication untIl lunch time. Týhon ho told her hie mother was going te cail on lier. i9he declined the. lionour fi1rMly. Indeed I1 arn most grateful, to her for lier lclnd thougliýt,\" she said, \"but I canno't lot lier come. Please tell lier I appreciate lier kindaoss, notwIthlstand- lng.\"t qHe saw that appeal was uselese. In hie vexation lie revealed the fact that ho liad hoped hie mothor alght Induco 'ler te come to lunch of a day. She thought of the farmhouse iuoals. anid scknowledged that the prospect was temnptlng. IlBut JI slould have refused,\" \u0026lhe eaid. and added: \"It seoms te me that I amrnaow, and shahl be henceforth, obllged to refuse moet of the good tlhings cf this life.\" OHAPTER VII. ,A Declaration. M %IR WiLIAAMS was, ow lrmly es.tablislod as a typiet 'to Ron- ai-d 'Westlake. Iu a business point of vlew lie declarod that fill was invaluable to hlm. Puctual to a mo- ment 'both imorning and afternoou, or- derly, inothodioal, qulok, clever. Ai- thougli theîr aoqua.ttauce was cf so rocent a date, lie consulted lier about everythinig conaeoted with thle bual- ness, eiFaetly as ho wou.ld have cou- sultoti a very clevor wlf e who, was groatly intorested inl has work. it ila true tia\u003et she was ignorant to \u003eegln with, but she qulckly aequlred a 'yast doal o! knowledge, aud lier ex- perloace amnongst the mill lande, as one0 cf themselvos, hlped lier ta mak- Ing suggestions to hlm wlien ho formed plans for 'theïr wel'faro or amiusemnent. He now gave lier only bare drafts o! his leitera; she anplified thein wltl the abllity of a skul'lod dlecit, and pro- gonteti thomn to hlm, neatly typewrit- ton, for signature; thue saving hlm heurs cf work. 3he lad really tolleti to g-ain speo in laler wrlting, and waa now a 'rapld typlat. 'He watched lier white flugors fiyiag over the keys of the typewriter wltli admiration.\"Ia goiug to increase yeur salary by 111 pounde,\" lie aunouncod one day, \" you are 'fuliy wortl it to me.\" \"The question le, amn I wor.th it the market? Yeu kucw that I aml noi 'Il know nothing of the klnd. If yt were, to leave me I sliouid nover aga. empioy a woman. I couidu't after lie ing lad yon, nnd a man would cc £115O0 to £ 2-H a year. I can't do Wlt out a typIst after being accuseomed :one, -and lie would mot be nearly useful 'to me as you, for I sliould n trust hlm 'with the lettors I give Y' -to write. 'Now, do yon s5es that üý huudred and fifty pounde a year-'va income !-Is oniy your due. MWhetli you see it -or not, liowever, I intenti give it you.\" 'She liked this masterful toue fr0 hlm; lier ouly foar was when hie toi becamie so'ft, for she .was not sure th she could always bli hlm lu chieck. \"If yen are sure I earn lt I muet 0 mît that the extra money wlll be vo useful to me.\" But It was net of h( self sho was thiuking ia connocti' witli It. III am quite, sure. Resistance 15 lli les.\" Notwltlstandlng, in sipite of t value o! lier services (and tVils W; re-al, not im-agiuary), the extra tfI pounde was not insorted In the ofn accounts. Rontald paid It out of own pocket, andi saId to hlmef ItW a luxury lie could well afford. di DOiN'T want my father to be te I lag me 'what le the ordinary i) cr pay for female clerle thougli, indeeti, M-r. Westlalte, as matter cf fact, would have said nol ing of the kinti, and was wlser th~ lisa son imiagined. He hadl felt sor amount o! curlosity concerning 't' typiet for whom sucli preparations h been neoesýsarýy, andi lad la hie lieo laughod to scorn the Idea that she Wi an elderly dragon. Ho watched qui, ly co day untll she hll left the 0DU and followed lier somle little dlstan( unkaown to hersoîf, noting hor pearance, lier gaft, lier style, ail ,whlch he de.olared to be \"tlp-top.\" F thougi no't cf the hlghlest class, he hl of iite years, mIxed wlth it a gooti de and eculd ightly estîmfate a lady. -,No wonder expensive earpeta ive noceessary!\" le chuckiod to hlmsE -Weil, I shan't ýsay anythlug'to t misais. Let 'ler flnd It eut for herse A prcud girl, I clau see, but a goo0d gi .toe. If ie ýdoesn't f ail ia love witli b lies a greater foo1 than I take hlm be, thougih lie ouglit to look mudli lig er for a wife. lt lsn't my businOJ ,thougi, to mneddlo witli a man of E.( aid's age; lie ust con duct hie ffi affars.\" It vmas wlth ne slIglit woader th Mrs. Westiake lad heard of Miss ¶ liame' djeclslcn not to ho called 8he could not understa.ad so great honour beiug refused. ,,Ahi poor thîngr\" elie exelaIrG one day. 'Il dure say she's aot acel tomed *to any socloty, anti la afrald me. Sill, Its a plty she, woulda',t col to lunch o! a day, poor soul! I wOu have taken tare she should ati events have one good meal a day.\" 'Ye, pocIr olti soul\"- Mr. Westla replled solemnly, but thero, waS twinkie ia île eyo, whI011 made 1 son sure, he knew the typlat wad 3 olti. 'Somilmes of an afternoou wh' there was not mudli work on hall 'Mary wouid allcw tlonald to tako easy chair in lier office anti tallk lier, lie kept lier supplled 'wlth ail tJ now books and perlodicais, whldli we a groat soiscýe to lier la the 10310 eveninge, and they discullsed theum torwardS toget-her, Ilis elear-cut iat' loctual face lightlng up wltli !pleastu 'Occaslonaily the-y ti4aagreed liot: wlen the conversation Nvauld el witl a laugli. He dlscoverod ail Il tastos and opinions, and revealed Il owa as lie lad nover done to anYO: ~before. - The more lie saw o! lier fJ mo10re lie realizeti low wisely hl\u0026 D miraýtien aud respocth'ad been grout] ed, 'while on lier part sho turnoti hlm and fouati com!ort in lis unfa ing frie-ndshlpand care of lier. H2e i formie lier lihat th, chocolat. aJ F'roneh swootmeats 'lsd been entlIr Mr. Htaselfoot's idea, and impress upon 1er liow ungrateful It wi\u003enld",
         "TIIE COURIER. to eat them. Her oak coffer was ai- lvthoijt choice fruit. Wbo takes it away when 1 do not ,it?\" she as-ked one day. 11'd. 1 throw it away.\" 40Ow wicked of you, when so many PIe 'Would be glad of -it 1\" can't help that. When you don't it 1 suppose it's, not good enougli YOU. and so, of course, I don't offeor e nyoue else. Lt goes luto the rand furuishes me witli a text ou sermon entltled The Imposslbility 'leasing Some. Women.\" laeyou adopted a tbeory tirat I 'ider notbing good enough for me? \u003eI must be a very ungrateful girl.\" SYOu were really grateful y-ou Id accept my humble offering In spirit iu wbich fi la made.\" ýIch means that lu the future I t eat everything. I obey your or- , sir.\", ý74exr you cail me sir I know you laughjng at me.\" ,Rn -lauglhig at you, s jr.\" ýes5,\" hie replied, bis deep feeling leirl\u003e expressiug Itseif lu rage. \"I w You lare. I know that If I were ,ear My life out lu efforts to serve it Would nut wei.gh ome jot 'with aud 'I should be \u003cof no more couse- 'ce to you than I arn now.\" en elnto 1his office and shiit the reiesumed ber work, going on Ont -a moment's cessation, a pink Of coloeur burniug lu her cheeks. La1'f,ast dive she collected ber pile lapons, and, after puttlng on lier tooli them. In to Ronald. have fiuished the work,,Mi-. West- 4S lad been fidgettlug for the last bhaif bour, woudering wby she dlid flot maire hier appearance. He ed for ber to -do so, but he 'would [intrude upon ber. He -was heart- sBhaIned of has outbrak 111l8hed It!\" hýe exclalmed. \"How MTuSt have worked! You must nlot Sovertime, Miss Williams,\" hie d gravely. v'erY Otton work -undertime. Good fl. beg you to remain a moment,\" be Inula low tlune. \"Once more I on- YOU'r Pardon. Wbhy do you rouse -s Yo\u003eudo?\" bave notbing to forgive. Once good afternoon.\" ei colduess of your voice shows àiat You bave not forgiven me. rOu flot be generous ?\" thluk thia conversation a little Iled for, Mr. Westlake. I have al- told you that I have notblng to eWent away as shbe spoke. But lad purposely aFsumed this cold- Sfor abe wals afraid te be kind. -elt very unhappy, and, instead of back to tihe farmi took the roa-d ~the factory, a;nd wandered on B lor. ld was wretched. \"Sire works P until 1 am beside myself,\" be anud tbon I behave like an un- ated brute, knowilg as I do that flust see me.\" His self-roproach Pex'haps somewliat; oxaggerated, Was very genuino. liad reacbed the moor when lie 310k bier. The everfings wore clos- n fast, and already the sunset and shadows ýwere falllig over rarid hbis. As scon as 8he saw 'cbarmlng smile appeared on hier ' and bis own lit up wlth jo\u003e'. -She ,rilven hlm, and hie had the tu know that furtlier apology 1 be out of place. You are wlth me,\" she sad, '«I we miglit walI\u003c to Sharp Tort. It far for me to go alone, now that ELY\u0026 are gettlng airorter.\" Il thought of lier joui-ne\u003e' across 1oor, wlien sire, hll slept two IIn the open air, but neltlrer al- to ItL Lt was a snost painful aub- (\u003e both-to lier ibecause of thre ac- \u0026cts; te hlm beonuse lie souglit 111 te realize what reason there ~be for sucli an extraordinary Bdlng. Ismour makes me 'feel,\"' she \"I could watch It for hours. It 8 the -ses, havin-g always saine It la the lfi-st time you have allorwed me to do so. 1 wish 1 could show you more of tbe beauties of the moor. Do you ride?\" \"I used to do so. I amn vory fond of horse exerciso.\" \"Wby sbould you not ride with me bei-e ?\" ,She srnilod. \"I tbink you forget Our respective circuatances. Lt woulýd Bllgbtly surprise the Miii banda to see me set Out lu a habit accompanled by you.', '1I coulýd meet you outside, the vil- lage.\" \"Lt la out of tire question, Mr. West- lake.\" \"Not Juat once?\" \"Not once.\" 'Would you do so If we were differ- eutly sit-uatod?\" \"R would do so with pleasure. Lt would delight me to gallop over the moor on oue of those pulies, but the thing la Impossible. Ou reflection you wlIl see tlis.\" 'ý1Perhaps you are riglit. Yet wby should you, lu your youth and boauty, bo cut off, es you said tire othýer day, from, nearly overything tbat makes lafe plealsant. Where are your frieuda? What can they be made of?\" 'iOli!\" she exclaimod sadly. \"Lt feels to me as if mýy feet were lu a net. Iu coming beore I thougbt that I should work for some bard, business employ- er, and ivo amongst the poor, un- knowu aud uunotlcod-lu that case matters would have boon simple e'nough-ibut, instead of this, you treat- ed me from the lui-t as a frieud, and 1 seern now incapable of dlstiugulshlug, riglit fi-rn wroug. 1 should liko to toell you everytbdung; perhaps I ouglit to (Io so. I feel that 1 arn de-ceilg you lu accepting your kindness; as it miglit be, If you kuew everythiug, you would shut your doors upon me. Alter your conduct; treat me as an ordîuary clerk, and then perliapa I shal nlot feel this compunetion. But one thiug I must tell you. My peuple are not to blame-frorn their point of viow-anà whatever 1 hlave gorile tbrougb bas been from my own voluntary choico.\" 661 S2HUT rny dooris upon you?\" lie Ireturned, stpeaking with excite- meut. \"I must spoali. I cur be sulent no longer. Fi-ou the lirat day I saw you 1 bave not only loved, but worshipped, Yeu. You are neyer out of my tbougbts, moruing, noon, or u.ight. Wiren yeu choose to exorcise It y-ou bave the power of drlvlug me almost beside myseif. Were you about to mari-y a muan lu your own station I would be silent, lot Il coat me what iL would; but I1 entreat you to -consider well -whoethei- you are dolng wlsely, ln *marryJng a man wbo \u003ebas not even suf- ficlent determînation to corne and claimi you. Glvo hlm up, and maire me the bupplest man lu the world by, rnarrying me.\"1 \"You must nlot speair to me in this way agai, Mr. Wostlakpe,\" she sald la low toues, and bo saw that lier usually bright oyes were dim with tea-s. \"A.nd you ai-e mistaken lu two points. He ' l flot below me lu station, and lie la coming thre very moment he eau do 30.11, \"T[ho rnysteiy la býeyond me,\" lie contluued, \"but I will trust you flow as5 I have trusted y9fl fi-om 'the lirst. Are 'you qulte sure you will not niarryt me?\" «'I amn qulte sure,\" she repled in low' ti-oubled toues. \"Then frorn lienceforth my lips 'sall, be sealed: fl hope 1 have some manli- ness about me, aud I wlll not persie- cute you. I expected thisa nswer - tiratisl to sa\u003e', 1 should have expected lt lied 1i ntenided to propose ta you, whicli I 4111 flt-but stll it 1ls a ireavY blow. Give me a lttle tlimte.1 ,e tu'aed lis bavk ou be and woit a little distance away. She remaiiied s1tanding, looklng at the ranges o hUIls aci-oss the valley wlth a heart fuill of pain. As before, di-oves of poniles i-an about nier-il\u003e', the sta.tely red cattle grazed around, the lieatlier was stili lni 'bloom, but she looked on ail around lier with unselug eyes, the perplexed tangle of existence oppressing hr. -Hupmiobile for Nineteen SixteenI Hiéher than ever in quality-more comfortable -economical -as Hlupmobiles have -always beenl In the 1916 Hupmobile we have gonle to greater leugths. 4than ever before te malutain the H7upmobile reputatiou for quality. The new car bas twenty per cent, moi-e power, giving a quicker pickup, an \u003eeven stronger pull on his and in sand, and slower running ou high speed. Note these me- chanical features: 'Tungsten steel valves, disc clutch with 16 hardened steel plates, brouze-shel motor bearings, spiral bevel gea-a lu rear axie, nickel steel axle-shafta, vana- dium steel mainleaf ln springs, tubular propeller shaft. Com- pare these features with any car ou the marktet. The 1916 Hupmnobile main- tains the reputation of earlier Hupmnobiles for economy. It wlll probably reduce the Hup- mobile repair coat record of less than 14 cent per mile. Though twenty per cent, more powerful the 1916 car la a fit companion for our earlier modela in gasoline mileage, tire service, and o11 conaumaption. We have been told countlesa timea that the 1915 Hupmobile la the easlest rldlug car ever bult. The 19,16 Hupmnobile la more comfortable. The up- holstery la deeper. Genuine high grade hair and lmproved cushion constructiou give the comfort of an old shoe. Siprings are oven more flexible and easy ridiug. Tires are large lu pro- ridiug. The upholstery la genu- lue, hlgh grade leather. liloor- boarda and clear runuing boards are beat linoleumn. The tonneau la rlchly carpeted. The new bodies have a depth of color and luster of finish yon have heretofore seen eul lu highest prlced cars. Fondera, radiator, andi motor bonnet are enameiied by a uew proceas-- beautiful and long wearlng. The 1916 flupmobie has the famous Blini- ayatem for elec- tric startlug and lightIng. This MADE IN oquimen laused ou aone of teheigheat prIced cars. Latest improved battery ignition- sureat and simpleat built-Is used. Iu our own shops we bulld the genuine Goldie one man top and Collins quick-act- ing curtains. Five demount- able rima, complete electric lighting equipment, lateat and beat apeodometer. an exclusive design ramn vision and ventilat- ing windshieid, Hupmobile pat- onted tati light, crown fenders, nou-skid rear tires, are regular equipment. lu considering the 1916 Hup- mobile pPase remember that the H-upp Motor Car Company la -ne of the few manufacturera that have neyer bult a poor car or had an off year. Wherever you go Yeu will hear the Hup- mobile apoken of as a car of most unusual value at its price. That la why -we believe the Hupmoblle to, be, the boat car oif its clasa lu the world.\"' That creod oif ours la fact to Hup- mobile owners. The reputation of quallty lu our cara la the blggeat aaaet of oui- business. And we guard it moat iealously. So when we tell you the 1916 Hupmobiles are the beat cars thia company has ever bult, and when we offer yen ou- beat cars at a reduction lu prices, you may woll take oui- word for it that yen will make no mis- take lu selectiug a Hupmoblle. But %ve don't ask you to ac- cept our Word alone. We do asir you to see the 1916 Hupmoblle -to ride lu it-to drive It if you wlll. Write for your copy oif oui- new catalog which illustrates sud deacribos lu detail aIl the 1916 cars. And ask the Hup- mobile dealer lu your clty to show you lu an actual moeit test that the 1916 Hupmobile la Juat what we say-truly \"the beat car of its clasa lu the world\" 16 IHU PMOBILE PRICES FIve-BissengerTouring Car, $1385 Roadster, $1385 -Sedan, $1820 -Limousine, $3185 IIXýearTouring Car, $1525 - AII-Year Coupe, $1500 Seven-PassengerTouring Car, $163S5 HUPP MOTOR- CAR COMPANY, WINDSOR, ONT. Electric Service Means elomfort, coiivenaence, eeonomy, and safety. The homie that is completely equipped with elee. trit-al devices is a happy one. Ail the drudgery of housekeeping is e1irninated. hy You can wash, iron, sew, sweep, eook, keep cool in suiZmer and warm ini winter, by means of electrical 'apparatus designed especiaily tO relieve you of unneeessary~ and fatilguing labor. At our showrooms ail these devices are ready for your inspection. Competent deinonstr\u0026tors will operate and explain Vhexn for you. The Toot Electrjc LIghf Co., Llmifed \"«AT FOUR SERVICE\" déad St. E. Téléphone Adelalda 4o4 ADVERTISING POUICY will nlot, knowingly orin rtentionally, insert advertisenxents i other than perfeculy reliable firmes or business men, If suli- )ers find any, of them to lie otherwise, we will esteem i a __5 ý1. - - i 1l - . . - wlth you",
         "T HERE'S no reason why a dealer shouldn't gladly Isupply yuwith \"Dominion\" Tires-unle -ss hie prefers to, make a bigger profit and give you legs value for your money. Nor is there any reason in the world why you shouldn't get \" Dominion \" Tires-unless you let a dealer switch you. Say \"Dominion\"~ and stick to it! Nobby Treaid Beat for ciii- round srie ai the tinte, everywhe r. Gripa the alipper- jeat pavements- saves 90, par cent of puncturoïs. Chain Tread A n effective anti-suid tire at a moderato price. Plain Tread The bais of ail \"Dominion\"\" Tires -the. masterpiace of tirc-making skili. Every \"Dominion\" Tire carnies our regular warranty of p erfect material and workmianship, and ail adjustments are made on a basis of mileage-5,000 for Nobby and 3,500 for Chain 'and Plain Treads. Though they May cost a little more at first, \"Dominion\" 'Tires, are most economical in the, long run, because they give you extra mileage and service. Say \"Dominion\"-and stick to it! And stick to the dealers who seIl \"Dominion\" Tires and are proud of it. They promote their own interests by first looking after yours. If you have any trouble in finding those dealers, write our nearest Branch or our Home Office in Montreal. We will see that you are supplied'promptly. CANADIAN CONSOLIDATED RUBBER CO., Limited 28 BRANCHES IN CANADA Head Office: MONTREAL, P. Q."
      ],
